Last updated: 7/22/2024
PLEASE READ THESE TERMS AND CONDITIONS (TERMS or AGREEMENT) BEFORE USING THE SERVICES (AS DEFINED BELOW).
THESE TERMS REQUIRE YOU TO ARBITRATE ANY DISPUTES YOU HAVE WITH US AND YOU WAIVE THE ABILITY TO BRING CLAIMS AGAINST US IN COURT, TO HAVE ANY DISPUTE HEARD BY A JUDGE OR JURY, OR TO BRING ANY CLAIMS AGAINST US IN A CLASS ACTION FORMAT. SEE Section 7(F) (Opt-Out) TO LEARN HOW TO OPT-OUT OF MANDATORY ARBITRATION.
THESE TERMS ALSO INCLUDES A WAIVER OF YOUR RIGHT TO BRING A CLASS ACTION LAWSUIT AGAINST US AND A RELEASE OF ALL CLAIMS AGAINST US THAT MAY ARISE OUT OF YOUR USE OF OUR SERVICES.
Welcome to Chess.com!
Put simply: Respect others, respect the law, and enjoy yourself!
The website Chess.com, (the “Site“) along with all related content, features, mobile and web applications (“Apps“), and other services (collectively with the Site and the Apps, the “Services“) are brought to you by Chess.com LLC (hereinafter referred to as “Chess.com“). By purchasing a subscription to the Services, registering an Account for, or just using the Services, you acknowledge that you have read and understand these Terms, and agree to be bound by them. Both these Terms and separate terms of service or sale documents may apply to your use of the Services or to a sweepstake, service, or product offered via the Services (
Additional Terms
). To the extent there is a conflict between these Terms and any Additional Terms, the Additional Terms will control unless expressly state otherwise.
In these Terms,
you
refers to Users (as defined below) of the Services and purchasers of Accounts (as defined below). An
Adult
is a person of lawful age under the laws applicable to the location in which the person resides and who can lawfully enter into a contract. By purchasing a subscription to, registering for, or using the Services, you represent and warrant that you are an Adult.
This is a legally binding agreement between you and us. Our
Fair Play Policy
,
Subscriber Agreement
,
Community Policy
,
Competitive Events and Prizes Policy
,
Giveaways, Games of Chance and Sweepstakes Policy
,
Courses Terms
, and
Gift Membership Service
(the “Other Policies“) all are fully integrated into these Terms, meaning that by accepting these Terms, you also accept the Other Policies. If you are unable to access any of the Other Policies using the links above, please notify us at
https://chess.com/support
. Further, our
Privacy Policy
describes how we collect, handle and use the information you provide to us when you use the Service.
To enter into this Agreement, use the Services, and/or create an account with us, you must be at least 13 years of age. If you are not of legal age in your jurisdiction -- but are at least 13 years of age - then your parent or legal guardian must consent to this Agreement on your behalf prior to your use of the Services and you may only use the Services with the consent and involvement of your parent or legal guardian. If you know of someone under the age of either 13 or the legal age in their jurisdiction (whichever is older) who is using the Service -- or has created an account with us -- and they are doing so without parental/guardian consent, then please notify us at
https://chess.com/support
. We do not ask you for your birth date, if you use the Service or create an account with us, then you are affirming that you meet these requirements and we are permitted to reasonably rely on that.
These Terms, the Other Policies and our Privacy Policy may be updated or modified from time to time so you should check this page regularly to look for any changes. If you continue to use our Services, then you are telling us that you continue to agree to any changes to these agreements and policies. We are not required to notify you in the event that we change any of our policies except, if you are a resident of a State or country where the legislation require us to notify you.
Summary of Key Points
You should read this entire Terms and Conditions and also our
Global Privacy Policy
and the Other Policies but here are some key points:
Each account is assigned to a single User, and it is intended solely for personal, non-commercial use.
You agree not to engage in any unlawful activities or harm others while using the Services.
By activating a Member Account, you agree that we may renew your subscription automatically for the same subscription term on the day after your previous subscription ends, and for Member Accounts, you authorize us to charge you for the subscription term, unless you cancel your Account prior to its renewal date through the procedures described in Section 1(D)(iii) (Subscription Cancellation).
YOU AGREE TO ARBITRATE DISPUTES RATHER THAN GOING TO COURT as set forth in Section 7 (Arbitration and Dispute Resolution).
Your use of the Services is AS IS, without warranty and will result in no liability to us as set forth in Section 8 (Disclaimer of Representations and Warranties) and Section 9 (Limitations of Liability).
Table of Contents
1. Accounts, Passwords, and Payments
2. Services Ownership and License
3. Content You Submit
4. Services and Content Use Restrictions
5. Linking to and from Our Services
6. Governing Law
7. Arbitration & Dispute Resolution
8. Disclaimer of Representations and Warranties
9. Limitations of Liability
10.Indemnity
11.Infringement Policy and Reporting Procedure
12.Wireless Features
13.Submission of Feedback
14.General Provisions
1. Accounts, Passwords, and Payments
A. Account Types
A User is capable of using some of our Services for free and also subscribe to become a member.A User does not need to be a Member to use our Services. A Member who subscribes to one of our Accounts is capable of using a larger portfolio of our Services which will depend on the the applicable Account subscription terms. The provisions of this policy apply to all Accounts.
Member Accounts
Member Accounts are accounts offered by us, or through one of our affiliates, that are designed for home use and are not classified as another of the types of accounts mentioned in these Terms. A Member Account is available for use by one User.
Gift Accounts
We offer the option of purchasing prepaid, nonrefundable, nontransferable access to a Member Account as a gift (
Gift Account
). See our
Gift Membership Service Policy
for the terms and conditions that apply.
B. Passwords and Account Access
Every Account has one designated User who must be a person of lawful age under the laws applicable to the location in which the person resides and who can lawfully enter into a contract. You are responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of your password and Account information. You agree that: (a) you will provide complete and accurate registration information about yourself and any individual you authorize to access your Account and keep your Account information up to date; (b) you are solely responsible for all activities that occur under your Account; (c) you will notify us immediately of any unauthorized Account use; (d) we are in no way responsible for any loss that you may incur as a result of any unauthorized use of your Account and password; and (e) you will not sell, transfer, or assign your Account or any Account rights. If we learn that an ineligible User has created an Account, we may seek confirmation of the User's status or deactivate the Account, without notice to the ineligible User.
C. Account Registration
A User must register an Account by: (a) providing true, accurate, current, and complete information about yourself as prompted by our registration form; and (b) maintaining and promptly updating the Registration Data to keep it true, accurate, current, and complete. If you provide any information that is untrue, inaccurate, not current, or incomplete, or if we have reasonable grounds to suspect that such information is untrue, inaccurate, not current, or incomplete, then we will suspend or terminate your account and refuse any and all current or future use of the Service.
D. Account Fees
For certain types of Accounts, we may charge a fee, such as an Account or subscription fee. All fees are due in accordance with payment terms in effect at the time the fee or the charge becomes due. We may offer promotional trial subscriptions to access the Services for free or at special discounted prices. If you sign up for a trial subscription, your rights to use the Services are limited by the terms of such trial and will terminate or renew according to the terms of your trial arrangement and/or any applicable Additional Terms. Please note that we do not provide price protection or refunds for existing subscribers in the event of a price drop or promotional offering for new subscribers. Failure to pay any fees may result in your inability to access or use the Services.
(i) Authorization to Charge for Services
You must either use a credit card or other payment mechanism accepted by us (for example, PayPal, Apple's iTunes Store, etc.) (
Pay Mechanism
) to activate and maintain a paid Account. You authorize us to charge you through the Pay Mechanism that you use when registering for an Account. You will also be responsible for charges (including applicable taxes) for any products or services that you order that are offered for sale through the Services. All prices quoted for products or services are exclusive of tax, unless otherwise stated. Please note that we may take steps to verify your Pay Mechanism, which may include initiating a small (usually about $1.00 or so) authorization to your Pay Mechanism, even if you receive a free trial, which test authorization will be promptly reversed within the time period required by payment network rules. If we do not receive payment from the Pay Mechanism you use, you agree to pay all amounts due hereunder upon our demand and will be solely responsible for any dispute with your payment provider. Should the Pay Mechanism provided initially be declined for insufficient funds or any other reason, we reserve the right to attempt to recharge the Pay Mechanism in full or in lesser installments of the initially incurred charge for the duration of the Account subscription you selected and for up to an additional 90 days. You will not be charged more than the amount for which you purchased your Account subscription. You will be solely responsible for all overdraft fees and/or penalties that may be assessed by your payment provider. We use a third-party service provider to process payments on our behalf. You acknowledge and agree that in the event the third-party payment processor experiences a data breach that affects your information through no fault of ours we will in no way be responsible or liable to you for any such breach.
(ii) Subscription and Renewal
By activating a Member Account, you agree that we may renew your subscription automatically for the same subscription term on the next day after your previous subscription ends. You authorize us to charge you for the subscription term, unless you cancel your Account prior to its renewal date through the procedures described in the
Subscription Cancellation
section below. We will charge you using the Pay Mechanism each year, month, or other applicable period (depending on the term that you selected) for the then-current applicable price.
(iii) Subscription Cancellation
Unless you purchased your subscription(s) through the iTunes Store or the Amazon Appstore, to cancel any subscription and avoid future charges, you may cancel such subscription prior to its renewal date through the Account area on our Home Page or by contacting our Member Support Team. If you contact our Member Support Team, please know that we try to handle requests within 12-24 business hours; however, we cannot guarantee that your cancellation will be registered within that time. If you downloaded our app through the iTunes Store or Amazon Appstore, you must follow the cancellation instructions provided in the iTunes Store or Amazon Appstore, as applicable. For all Accounts, you will continue to have access to your Account for the time period that has been prepaid. After you cancel your Account, we will not charge you any subscription fees after the expiration of your then-current subscription. Please note that we do not provide full or partial refunds for prepaid sums. In any event, you will be able to continue to use the Services throughout the remainder of the subscription period for which you have already paid.
E. Promotional Codes
We may, in our sole discretion, create Promotional Codes that can be redeemed for free time, discounts on our plans, gifts, Services or other features or benefits related to our Services. These Promotional Codes and special offers are subject to the terms of each offer, as described in the applicable advertisement, as well as the terms provided here. We only honor our own Promotional Codes sent to you through our own approved communication channels.
Promotional Codes: (i) are available only for Users with a Member Account; (ii) must be used in a lawful manner and only for the intended audience and purpose; (iii) may only be redeemed once per Account, (iv) may not be combined with other Promotional Codes; (v) if redeemed on one Member Account, may not be transferred to a different Member Account; (vi) unless we expressly authorize it, may not be duplicated, sold, or transferred in any manner, or made available to the general public (whether posted to a public forum or otherwise); (vii) may be disabled or revoked by us at any time for any reason without liability; (viii) may not be redeemed for cash, gift cards, cash equivalents, or duplicate benefits, nor may they be exchanged for other plans or Services, or additional time on our plans or Services; and (ix) cannot be used retrospectively.
2. Services Ownership and License
A. Ownership
As between us and you, the Services (including past, present, and future versions) are owned and controlled by us and their Content is protected by U.S. and international copyright, trademark, trade dress, patent, and other intellectual property rights and laws to the fullest extent possible.
Content
means all text, graphics, user interfaces, visual interfaces, photographs, logos, sounds, music, artwork, and computer code displayed on or available through the Services and the design, structure, selection, coordination, expression, and arrangement of such materials including, without limitation, (i) materials and other items relating to us and our products and services, including, without limitation, all activities, printables, characters, photographs, audio clips, sounds, pictures, videos, and animation; (ii) trademarks, logos, trade names, service marks, and trade identities of various parties, including ours (collectively,
Trademarks
); and (iii) other forms of intellectual property.
B. Limited License
Subject to your compliance with these Terms, any applicable Additional Terms, your use of our Services, and/or your payment of any applicable subscription fees, we grant you a limited, nonexclusive, revocable, nonassignable and nontransferable license (
License
) to access, display, view, use, play, and/or print one copy (excluding certain printable activities made available through the Services, which indicate that they may be printed multiple times) of the Content on a personal computer, mobile phone or other wireless device, or other internet-enabled device (each, an
Internet Device
) for your personal, noncommercial use only. The License does not give you any ownership of, or any other intellectual property interest in, any Content or the Services, and you cannot otherwise use the Content or the Services without our express prior written permission. All rights not expressly granted to you are reserved by us and/or our licensors and other third parties. Except as expressly provided in these Terms or with our express prior written consent, no part of the Services and no Content may be used, copied, reproduced, distributed, uploaded, posted, publicly displayed, translated, transmitted, broadcast, sold, licensed, or otherwise exploited for any purpose whatsoever. Any unauthorized use of any Content or the Services for any purpose is prohibited.
You agree not to modify the Content in any manner or form, nor to use modified versions of the Content, including (without limitation) for the purpose of obtaining unauthorized access to the Service. You agree not to access the Service by any means other than through the interface that is provided by Chess.com for use in accessing the Service. This license is freely revocable by us at any time.
You agree not to display or use our trademarks in any manner without our prior permission.
C. User Game Activity (UGA)
Our Services also include the generation and maintenance of a record of each user's game activity, history, statistics, archive, and a public record of play. When you play a chess game through the Service, a record of the game activity in such chess game (“UGA“), may be available to you, other users, and the public, in certain formats, including but not limited to, Portable Game Notation (also known as PGN), Forsyth-Edwards Notation (also known as FEN), GIF, and/or JPEG. The UGA may include certain of your Content (e.g. your username, profile picture, and country), which is subject to the license grant in the section titled “License to Access and Use the UGA“ below.
This record of your UGA is publicly available and can be accessed, used, and monetized by anyone for any number of purposes, including, but not limited to, publishing images of your UGA in for example, blogs, videos, social media posts, game collections, or creating NFTs.
D. License to Access and Use the UGA
We grant you a limited, nonexclusive license to access, display and use the UGA, including the UGA of certain games played by other users on the Service; provided, however, that license is subject to this Agreement and does not include any right to: (a) sell, resell or use it commercially; (b) hide, delete, modify or otherwise make any derivative uses of the UGA, or any portion thereof; (c) use any data mining, robots or similar data gathering or extraction methods; (d) download (other than page caching) any portion of the UGA; except as expressly permitted by us; and (f) use the UGA other than for their intended purposes. The UGA may include our trademarks, service marks, logos, trade names, graphics, user interface, design, and/or other proprietary designations of Chess.com. You acknowledge that nothing in this license will be interpreted to grant you any rights to such marks or design that may be displayed or contained in any UGA, other than the right to display them as incorporated in the UGA, subject to the restrictions contained in this Agreement.
3. Content You Submit
We may allow the recording, submission, or distribution of artwork, audio, video, or other Content created by Users (
User-Generated Content
) on or through the Services. If you are an Adult, you consent to the publication of any testimonials you send to us along with your name and other information you submit in connection with such testimonial.
You understand that all information, data, text, software, music, sound, photographs, graphics, video, messages, tags, or other materials, whether publicly posted or privately transmitted, are the sole responsibility of the person from whom such Content originated. This means that you, and not Chess.com, are entirely responsible for all Content that you upload, post, email, transmit or otherwise make available via the Service. We do not control the Content posted via the Service and, as such, do not guarantee the accuracy, integrity or quality of such Content. You understand that by using the Service, you may unintentionally be exposed to Content that is offensive, indecent or objectionable. Under no circumstances will Chess.com be liable in any way for any Content, including, but not limited to, any errors or omissions in any Content, or any loss or damage of any kind incurred as a result of the use of any Content posted, emailed, transmitted or otherwise made available via the Service.
You acknowledge that Chess.com may or may not pre-screen Content, but that Chess.com and its designees shall have the right (but not the obligation) in our sole discretion to pre-screen, refuse, or remove any Content that is available via the Service. Without limiting the foregoing, Chess.com and our designees shall have the right to remove any Content that violates this Agreement or is otherwise objectionable. We may remove any Content on the Service for any reason and may suspend or terminate users or reclaim usernames at any time without liability to you. We also reserve the right to access, read, preserve, and disclose any information as we reasonably believe is necessary to (i) satisfy any applicable law, regulation, legal process, or governmental request, (ii) enforce this Agreement, including investigation of potential violations hereof, (iii) detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues, (iv) respond to user support requests, or (v) protect the rights, property, or safety of Chess.com, its users, and the public.
We do not and cannot monitor Content generated by other users. We do not warrant the suitability of any user-generated content for any other users, including you.
You understand that the Service and software embedded within the Service may include security components that permit digital materials to be protected, and that use of these materials is subject to usage rules set by Chess.com and/or content providers who provide content to the Service. Such embedded software may include cookies. Please review our cookie policy for further information.
You may not attempt to override or circumvent any of the usage rules embedded into the Service. Any unauthorized reproduction, publication, further distribution or public exhibition of the materials provided on the Service, in whole or in part, is strictly prohibited.
Chess.com does not claim ownership of Content or User-Generated Content you submit or make available for inclusion on the Service. However, you grant us a worldwide, royalty-free, perpetual, irrevocable, transferable, non-exclusive license, with right of sublicense, to use, distribute, reproduce, modify, adapt, publish, translate, transmit, publicly perform and publicly display any Content and User-Generated Content you submit or make available for inclusion on publicly accessible areas of the Service and to incorporate such Content into other works in any format or medium now known or later developed. Such license grant will continue after you delete your Chess.com account or if we otherwise disable, suspend or terminate your Chess.com account pursuant to this Agreement. For clarity, this license grant includes the right, with the right of sublicense, to publish, re-use, or monetize any Content, games, comments, usernames, or other UGA associated with your account (as defined below) and/or your Content (e.g. your Chess.com account username, profile picture, and country). We may sublicense such rights to third parties; for example, we may sublicense this right to Connected Services (as defined below). By posting or otherwise making available Content through the Services (including your Chess.com account profile picture), you represent that you have all rights, licenses, consents, permissions, power and authority necessary to grant the rights for such Content.
Recording, relaying, and sharing videos of the use of the Chess.com interface (for example in videos for YouTube, on Twitch, etc) is allowed provided that our logo is shown in the interface and for a non-commercial use. The recorded material is owned by the creator, though the interface, designs, and artwork remains our property. We will continue to retain the right, however, to revoke your permission to use our property at any time at our own discretion.
4. Services and Content Use Restrictions
A. Account Restrictions
Chess.com may establish general practices and limits concerning use of the Service, including without limitation the maximum number of days that email messages, message board postings or other uploaded Content will be retained by the Service, the maximum number of email messages that may be sent from or received by an account on the Service, the maximum size of any email message that may be sent from or received by an account on the Service, the maximum disk space that will be allotted on our servers on your behalf, and the maximum number of times (and the maximum duration for which) you may access the Service in a given period of time. Chess.com has no responsibility or liability for the deletion or failure to store any messages and other communications or other Content maintained or transmitted by the Service. We reserve the right to log off accounts that are inactive for an extended period of time.
Furthermore, with respect to the Fair Play Policy, we also may establish general practices and limits concerning the use of your account, including without limitation: monitoring your game data and behavior and, upon finding your behavior suspicious, restricting your game play, removing you from an event, or preventing you from joining an event. Other examples of our general practices concerning the use of your account upon finding your behavior suspicious may include letting the public know your account or game play is under review and making public any communications between us and you related to our finding your behavior suspicious. For clarity, we have complete discretion with respect to your account and related communications when finding your behavior suspicious in any respect.
Chess.com reserves the right to modify these general practices and limits from time to time without notice to you.
B. Termination of Account
We may, with or without cause, and without prior notice, immediately terminate, suspend, disable or delete your account, any associated email address, and access to the Service. Compliance with this Agreement or the Other Policies does not constitute a promise or guarantee of future access to the Service. Cause for such termination may include, but not be limited to, (a) breaches or violations of this Agreement or other incorporated agreements or guidelines, (b) requests by law enforcement or other government agencies, (c) a request by you (self-initiated account deletions), (d) discontinuance or material modification to the Service (or any part thereof), (e) unexpected technical or security issues or problems, (f) extended periods of inactivity, (g) engagement by you in fraudulent or illegal activities, and/or (h) nonpayment of any fees owed by you in connection with the Services. If terminated for actions causing actual, compensable harms to us (for example, participating in a data breach of Chess.com), we shall enjoy all rights and remedies against you, including seeking its remedies through the courts of the State of Utah or otherwise.
Termination of your Chess.com account may include us taking the following measures: (a) removal of access to all offerings within the Services, (b) deletion of your password and all related information, files and content associated with or inside your account (or any part thereof), (c) barring of further use of the Services, (d) if you violate the Fair Play Policy, labeling your account as having been closed for violating the Fair Play Policy, as well as removing your profile avatar, name and personal information from the account (but retaining its username, email address, evidence of violations and/or FIDE ID), (e) if you violate the Fair Play Policy while playing an event, the event organizer may disqualify you from the event due to your Chess.com account having been closed for a Fair Play Policy violation, and (f) if you violate the Community Policy, labeling your account as having been closed for abuse, as well as removing your profile avatar, name and personal information from the account (but retaining its username, email address, evidence of violations and/or FIDE ID).
Further, you agree that all terminations shall be made in our sole discretion and that we shall not be liable to you or any third party for any termination of your account, any associated email address, or access to the Services. There is no right to appeal the termination of a Chess.com account unless we, in our sole discretion, determine to provide such an appeal. If you are subject to the GDPR or if you are a domiciliary of the State of California, termination of your Chess.com account does not terminate your right to receive a copy of, or request the deletion of, any personal data that we hold or process for you.
C. User Conduct
You agree to not use the Services to:
upload, post, email, transmit or otherwise make available any Content that is unlawful, harmful, threatening, abusive, harassing, defamatory, vulgar, obscene, sexually explicit, pornographic, libelous, invasive of another's privacy, hateful, or racially, ethnically or otherwise objectionable;
post any comments, text, messages, or links in the forums or any public comments that contain any advertisements of any kind, including religious, political, or recruiting messages for Chess.com groups, clubs, blogs, or any other content on or off of Chess.com;
post any comments, text, messages, or links in the forums or any public comments that is off topic or irrelevant to the purpose and content of the original content, game, article, blog, or forum topic;
threaten violence against anyone else or advocate harming yourself;
“
stalk
“ or otherwise harass another;
impersonate any person or entity, including, but not limited to, a Chess.com representative, or falsely state or otherwise misrepresent your affiliation with a person or entity;
forge headers or otherwise manipulate identifiers in order to disguise the origin of any Content transmitted through the Service;
upload, post, email, transmit or otherwise make available any Content that you do not have a right to make available under any law or under contractual or fiduciary relationships;
upload, post, email, transmit or otherwise make available any Content that includes the personal information of anyone else without their permission or that infringes any patent, trademark, trade secret, copyright, rights of publicity or other proprietary rights of any party;
upload, post, email, transmit or otherwise make available any unsolicited or unauthorized advertising, promotional materials, “
junk mail
,“ “
spam
,“ “
chain letters
,“ “
pyramid schemes
,“ or any other form of solicitation, except in those areas that are designated for such purpose;
use, reproduce, or remove any copyright, trademark, service mark, trade name, slogan, logo, image, or other proprietary notation displayed on or through the Services;
upload, post, email, transmit or otherwise make available any material that contains software viruses or any other computer code, files or programs designed to interrupt, destroy or limit the functionality of any computer software or hardware or telecommunications equipment;
disrupt the normal flow of dialogue or otherwise act in a manner that negatively affects other users' ability to engage in real time exchanges;
access or use the Services in any manner that could disable, overburden, damage, interfere with or disrupt the Services or servers or networks connected to the Services or any other party's access to or use of the Services;
disobey any requirements, procedures, policies or regulations of networks connected to the Services;
download, modify, copy, distribute, transmit, display, perform, reproduce, duplicate, publish, license, create derivative works from, or offer for sale any information contained on, or obtained from or through, the Services, except for temporary files that are automatically cached by your web browser for display purposes, or as otherwise expressly permitted in this Agreement;
duplicate, decompile, reverse engineer, disassemble or decode the Services (including any underlying idea or algorithm), or attempt to do any of the same;
use automation software (bots), hacks, modifications (mods) or any other unauthorized third-party software designed to modify the Services;
access, tamper with, or use non-public areas of the Services, Chess.com's computer systems, or the technical delivery systems of our providers;
probe, scan, or test the vulnerability of any system or network or breach or circumvent any security or authentication measures;
use any robot, spider, site search/retrieval application, or other manual or automatic device or process to retrieve, index, “data mine,“ or in any way reproduce or circumvent the navigational structure or presentation of the Services or its contents;
cancel orders repeatedly in abuse of our refund policy;
intentionally or unintentionally violate any applicable local, state, national or international law, and any regulations having the force of law;
collect or store personal data about other users in connection with the prohibited conduct and activities set forth in the paragraphs above and/or
access or use the Services in any way not expressly permitted by this Agreement.
You agree not to reproduce, duplicate, copy, sell, trade, resell or exploit for any commercial purposes, any portion of the Services (including your Chess.com username), use of the Services, or access to the Services. You agree that your Chess.com account is non-transferable.
Compliance with the above rules and regulations does not constitute a guarantee of continued access to the Services or use of Chess.com. We reserve the right to limit or terminate your access to Chess.com and/or the Services at any time.
D. International Usage
These Services are provided by Chess.com from its offices in the United States of America. We make no representation that the Services are appropriate or available in other locations. Those who choose to access the Services from other locations do so on their own initiative and are responsible for compliance with local laws, if and to the extent local laws are applicable. You represent and warrant that you are not listed on any U.S. government list of prohibited or restricted parties.
5. Linking to and from Our Services
A. Linking to or Framing Our Services
When linking to our Services, you must adhere to the following requirements: (i) the link to the Services must not create the false appearance that your website and/or organization is sponsored by, endorsed by, affiliated with, or associated with us; and (ii) you may not link to the Services from a website that is unlawful, that promotes violence or illegal acts; or that contains expressions of racism. Subject to these restrictions, you also may use or frame or use framing techniques to enclose any of our trademarks, logos, or other proprietary information, including the images found on the Services, the content of any text or the layout or design of any page, or form contained on a page, on the Services.
We reserve the right to prohibit linking to or framing the Services consistent with these restrictions.
B. Third-Party Connected Services
Certain Connected Services may include functionality whereby you can link your Chess.com account with your account on such Connected Service or otherwise use your Chess.com account credentials to sign into such Connected Service. Upon doing so, you acknowledge and agree that certain of your Chess.com account information may be shared with the provider of such Connected Service in connection with your account on such Connected Service (e.g. username, profile picture, name, email, country, etc.). Your login information and password will not be shared. You will, of course, be subject to their separate Terms of Service, Privacy Policies, and other governance. Chess.com is not liable for your interactions with any Connected Service.
Any interactions, transactions, and other dealings that you have with any third parties found on or through the Services (including those that are linked from the Services) are solely between you and the third party (including issues related to payments, delivery of goods, and warranties), and we disclaim all liability in connection with such transactions.
6. Governing Law
THESE TERMS, AND ANY ADDITIONAL TERMS, WILL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF UTAH, WITHOUT REGARD TO ITS CONFLICTS OF LAWS PRINCIPLES.
7. Arbitration & Dispute Resolution
THESE TERMS REQUIRE BOTH OF US TO ARBITRATE ANY DISPUTES WE HAVE WITH ONE ANOTHER AND WE BOTH WAIVE THE ABILITY TO BRING CLAIMS AGAINST ONE ANOTHER IN COURT, TO HAVE ANY DISPUTE HEARD BY A JUDGE OR JURY, OR TO BRING ANY CLAIMS AGAINST ONE ANOTHER IN A CLASS ACTION OR REPRESENTATIVE ACTION FORMAT.
PLEASE READ THIS ARBITRATION & DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROVISION CAREFULLY TO UNDERSTAND YOUR RIGHTS. YOU AGREE THAT ANY CLAIM THAT YOU MAY HAVE IN THE FUTURE MUST BE RESOLVED ON AN INDIVIDUAL BASIS THROUGH BINDING ARBITRATION. YOU ACKNOWLEDGE AND AGREE THAT YOU ARE WAIVING THE RIGHT TO A TRIAL BY JURY. THE RIGHTS THAT YOU WOULD HAVE IF YOU WENT TO COURT, SUCH AS DISCOVERY OR THE RIGHT TO APPEAL, MAY BE MORE LIMITED OR MAY NOT EXIST.
TO LEARN HOW TO OPT-OUT OF MANDATORY ARBITRATION, SEE SUB-PARAGRAPH F BELOW.
If any controversy, allegation, or claim under any legal theory, including but not limited to any federal or state statutory claims, common law claims, including those based in tort, fraud, misrepresentation, or contract, arises out of or relates to the Services or these Terms or the breach, termination, enforcement, interpretation, formation, or the validity thereof, and the issue of arbitrability (collectively, the
Dispute
), then we both agree to the following resolution process with respect to the Dispute. All issues are for the arbitrator to decide, including issues relating to the scope, conscionability, severance, and enforceability of this arbitration agreement. The parties acknowledge that these Terms evidence a transaction in interstate commerce. Notwithstanding the substantive law applicable to any arbitration, any arbitration conducted pursuant to these Terms shall be governed by the Federal Arbitration Act and the Federal Arbitration Act governs the interpretation and enforcement of this agreement to arbitrate.
To resolve any Dispute most efficiently, we both agree to first discuss the Dispute informally for at least 30 days. To do so, the party who wants to raise the Dispute must first send to the other party a notice that must include (1) a description of the Dispute and (2) a proposed resolution (together, the
Dispute Notice
). If you want to raise a Dispute, then you must send your Dispute Notice by certified mail to the address listed below in Sub-Paragraph J). If we would like to subsequently discuss your Dispute Notice with you, we will contact you by using the contact information included with your Dispute Notice. If we want to raise a Dispute, then we will send our Dispute Notice to you at the email address that we have on file for you. If we do not have a valid email address on file for you, we will send our Dispute Notice to you through a means that complies with the service of process rules in the state of Utah.
If you and us do not reach an agreed-upon resolution within 30 days of receipt of the Dispute Notice, then we both agree that the Dispute will be resolved solely by binding arbitration in accordance with the then-current Commercial Arbitration Rules of the American Arbitration Association (
AAA
). The arbitration will be heard and determined by a single neutral arbitrator who is a lawyer or retired judge, who will administer the proceedings in accordance with the AAA's Consumer Arbitration Rules. In resolving the Dispute, the arbitrator will consider applicable law, the provisions of these Terms and any Additional Terms, and any facts based upon the record and no other basis, and will issue a reasoned decision. If a party properly submits the Dispute to the AAA for arbitration and the AAA is unwilling or unable to set a hearing date within 60 days of the filing of a “demand for arbitration,“ then either party can elect to have the arbitration administered by Judicial Arbitration and Mediation Services, Inc. (
JAMS
), and determined by a single neutral arbitrator who is a lawyer or retired judge, using JAMS's Streamlined Arbitration Rules and Procedures, or by any other arbitration administration service to which you and we consent. You can obtain AAA and JAMS procedures, rules, and fee information as follows:
AAA: 800.778.7879 / JAMS: 800.352.5267
http://www.adr.org
http://www.jamsadr.com
A. Nature, Limitations, and Location of Alternative Dispute Resolution
In arbitration, as with a court, the arbitrator will resolve the submitted Dispute and can issue a decision consistent with this Section 7. However, WITH ARBITRATION, THERE IS NO JUDGE OR JURY; THE ARBITRATION PROCEEDINGS AND ARBITRATION ARE SUBJECT TO CERTAIN CONFIDENTIALITY RULES; AND JUDICIAL REVIEW OF THE ARBITRATION OUTCOME IS LIMITED. All parties to the arbitration will have the right, at their own expense, to be represented by an attorney or other advocate of their choosing. We both agree that any hearings held in the arbitration will be conducted virtually. You and we will pay the administrative and arbitrator's fees and other costs in accordance with the applicable arbitration rules, but if applicable arbitration rules or laws require us to pay a greater portion or all such fees and costs in order for this Section 7 to be enforceable, then we will have the right to elect to pay the fees and costs and proceed to arbitration. Discovery will be permitted pursuant to the applicable arbitration rules. The arbitrator's decision must consist of a written statement stating the disposition of each claim of the Dispute and must provide a statement of the essential findings and conclusions on which the decision and any award (if any) is based. Judgment on the arbitration decision and award (if any) may be entered into any court that has jurisdiction over the parties.
B. Small Claims Matters Are Excluded
As an exception to binding arbitration, we both retain the right to pursue, in a small claims court in Utah County, Utah, any Dispute that is within that court's jurisdiction and proceeds on an individual (non-class) basis. We will not demand arbitration in connection with any individual Dispute that you properly file and pursue in a small claims court, so long as the Dispute is pending only in that court.
C. Injunctive Relief
The foregoing provisions of this Section 7 will not apply to any legal action taken by either party to seek an injunction or other equitable relief in conjunction with any intellectual property claim or claim related to unauthorized access to data through the Services (including, but not limited to, claims related to patent, copyright, trademark, and trade secrets, and claims relating to the access or retrieval of data through the Services using an automated process such as scraping).
D. Timing of Claim
To help resolve any issues between you and us promptly and directly, you and the Company agree that any Dispute Notice must be sent, or that any small claims or injunctive relief complaint permitted under this Section 7 must be filed, within one year after the events giving rise to the Dispute arise; otherwise, the Dispute is waived.
E. No Class Actions.
You and the Company agree that each of us may bring claims against the other only on an individual basis and not as a plaintiff or class member in any purported class or representative action or proceeding. We both further agree that any Disputes will be arbitrated only on an individual basis and will not be consolidated with any other arbitrations or other proceedings that involve any claim or controversy of any other party. Also, the arbitrator(s) may award relief (including monetary, injunctive, and declaratory relief) only in favor of the individual party seeking relief and only to the extent necessary to provide relief necessitated by that party's individual claim(s).
F. Opt-out
You can choose to reject this arbitration agreement by sending us a written opt-out notice (
Opt-Out Notice
) within 30 days following the date you first agree to these Terms, by you must mail or email your Opt-Out Notice to the address listed below in Sub-Paragraph J. If mailed, the Opt-Out Notice must be sent certified mail and post-marked no later than 30 days following the date you first agree to these Terms. To be effective, the Opt-Out Notice must contain your name, address, and signature. If you opt-out of the arbitration agreement, then all other parts of the Terms will continue to apply to you. Opting out of this arbitration agreement has no effect on any previous, other, or future arbitration agreements that you may enter with the Company.
G. Survival of Arbitration Agreement
You and the Company agree that the agreement to arbitrate shall survive termination of these Terms, and the termination of any membership or account you may have with Company.
H. Severance of Arbitration Agreement
If the arbitrator decides that applicable law precludes enforcement of any of this arbitration agreement's limitations as to a particular claim for relief, then that claim (and only that claim) shall be severed from the arbitration and may be brought in court. In addition, notwithstanding anything to the contrary, if any part of this agreement to arbitrate is deemed invalid or inapplicable, the remainder of the agreement to arbitrate shall still be considered valid and enforceable.
I. Alternative Dispute Resolution
If your dispute pertains to a Chess.com finding that you violated its Fair Play Policy then, if you do not wish to submit it for arbitration with AAA, you may choose to submit it, instead, for final and binding arbitration with a Fair Play Panel of Experts. Chess.com shall enjoy the sole right to review any such claims submitted for resolution by the Fair Play Panel of Experts, and shall enjoy the right at its sole discretion to accept or reject any such claims for arbitration. If we reject such a claim for resolution by a Fair Play Panel of Experts, you still may use the Arbitration Procedure provided above.
This panel will conduct its hearing using AAA's Consumer Arbitration Rules, as modified by the Arbitration provisions in sub-paragraph C above.
Chess.com will pay all of the fees and costs associated with this Fair Play Panel proceeding (except for your attorney's fees). Both you and Chess.com will remain responsible for their own attorney's fees under all circumstances, no matter who prevails in this proceeding.
The Fair Play Panel will consist of three persons chosen by you and Chess.com from a panel of candidates, each of whom is either a recognized expert in the field of chess cheat detection or has obtained (and currently holds) at least the title of Chess International Master. The assembly and composition of a Fair Play Panel shall be entirely at the discretion of Chess.com and, by submitting to the jurisdiction of the Fair Play Panel, you agree that its decision shall be final and binding, with no opportunity for appeal unless Chess.com, in its sole discretion, elects to grant such an appeal.
J. Our Dispute Notification Contact
Chess.com LLC, Legal
877 E 1200 S #970397
Orem, UT 84097
Tel: 1 (800) 318-2827, ext. 121
Email:
legal@chess.com
Nothing herein shall be construed as consent by Chess.com to the jurisdiction of any court regarding claims unrelated to the use of the Services or these Terms
. If for any reason a dispute between you and Chess.com proceeds in court rather than in arbitration, then the laws of the State of Utah and the FAA will govern, without regard to or application of any conflict of law provisions or your state or country of residence.
Furthermore, any such dispute will be brought solely in the U.S. District Court located in Salt Lake County, Utah or the Utah State District Court in Utah County, Utah, United States. You consent to the jurisdiction of and venue in such courts and waive any objection that it is an inconvenient forum.
8. Disclaimer of Representations and Warranties
YOUR ACCESS TO AND USE OF THE SERVICES IS AT YOUR SOLE RISK.
THE SERVICES ARE PROVIDED ON AN “AS IS,“ “AS AVAILABLE,“ AND “WITH ALL FAULTS“ BASIS. Therefore, to the fullest extent permissible by law, we and our parent company, affiliates, subsidiaries, and each of their respective employees, officers, directors, members, managers, shareholders, agents, vendors, licensors, licensees, contractors, customers, successors, and assigns (collectively,
Chess.com
), hereby to the maximum extent permissible by applicable law, disclaim and make no representations, warranties, endorsements, or promises, express or implied, as to the following:
the Services (including the Content and the User-Generated Content);
the functions, features, or any other elements on, or made accessible through, the Services;
any products, services, or instructions offered or referenced at or linked through the Services;
whether the Services (and their Content), or the servers that make the Services available, are free from any harmful components (including viruses, Trojan horses, and other technologies that could adversely impact your Internet Device);
the specific availability of the Services, and whether any defects in the Services will be repaired, or will be repaired in a particular time frame; and
whether your use of the Services is lawful in any particular jurisdiction.
EXCEPTING ONLY AS MAY BE SPECIFICALLY SET FORTH IN ANY ADDITIONAL TERMS, CHESS.COM HEREBY FURTHER DISCLAIMS ALL WARRANTIES, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, NONINFRINGEMENT OR MISAPPROPRIATION OF INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS OF THIRD PARTIES, TITLE, CUSTOM, TRADE, QUIET ENJOYMENT, SYSTEM INTEGRATION, AND FREEDOM FROM ERRORS, COMPUTER VIRUSES OR OTHER HARMFUL ELEMENTS.
Some jurisdictions limit or do not allow the disclaimer of implied or other warranties, so the above disclaimers may not apply to the extent that such jurisdictions' laws are applicable.
9. Limitations of Liability
A. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES WILL CHESS.COM BE RESPONSIBLE OR LIABLE FOR ANY LOSS OR DAMAGES OF ANY KIND, including personal injury or death or for any direct, indirect, economic, exemplary, special, punitive, incidental, or consequential losses or damages including losses or damages in the form of lost profits, loss of goodwill, or loss of data that are directly or indirectly related to:
the Services (including the Content and the User-Generated Content);
your use of or inability to use the Services or the performance of the Services;
the failure of a User to learn or otherwise benefit educationally from his or her use of the Services;
any action taken in connection with an investigation by us or law enforcement authorities regarding your access to or use of the Services;
any action taken in connection with copyright or other intellectual property owners or other rights owners;
any errors or omissions in the Services' technical operation; or
any damage to any user's computer, hardware, software, modem, or other equipment or technology, including damage from any security breach or from any virus, bugs, tampering, fraud, error, omission, interruption, defect, delay in operation or transmission, computer line, or network failure or any other technical or other malfunction, including losses or damages in the form of lost profits, loss of goodwill, loss of data, work stoppage, inaccuracy of results, or equipment failure or malfunction.
The foregoing limitations of liability will apply even if any of the events or circumstances were foreseeable and even if we were advised of or should have known of the possibility of such losses or damages, regardless of whether you bring an action of contract, negligence, strict liability, or tort (including whether caused, in whole or in part, by negligence, force majeure, telecommunications failure, or destruction of the Services).
Some jurisdictions do not allow the exclusion or limitation of incidental or consequential damages of the sort that are described above, so the above limitation or exclusion may not apply to you.
EXCEPT AS MAY BE PROVIDED IN ANY ADDITIONAL TERMS, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, IN NO EVENT WILL CHESS.COM'S TOTAL LIABILITY TO YOU IN CONNECTION WITH YOUR ACCESS TO AND USE OF THE SERVICES AND YOUR RIGHTS UNDER THESE TERMS EXCEED THE AMOUNT PAID BY YOU TO US DURING THE PREVIOUS 12 MONTHS FOR ALL POSSIBLE DAMAGES, LOSSES, AND CAUSES OF ACTION.
B. EXCLUSIONS AND LIMITATIONS
SOME JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OF CERTAIN WARRANTIES OR THE LIMITATION OR EXCLUSION OF LIABILITY FOR INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES. ACCORDINGLY, SOME OF THE ABOVE LIMITATIONS MAY NOT APPLY TO YOU.
C. Dealings With Advertisers
Your correspondence or business dealings with, or participation in promotions of, advertisers found on or through the Services, including payment and delivery of related goods or services, and any other terms, conditions, warranties or representations associated with such dealings, are solely between you and such advertiser. You agree that Chess.com shall not be responsible or liable for any loss or damage of any sort incurred as the result of any such dealings or as the result of the presence of such advertisers on the Services. All third-party content, including advertised content, is solely the responsibility of those third-parties; we do not warrant the suitability of any third-party content for any purpose, nor do we warrant the accuracy or completeness of any third-party statements.
D. Links to the World Wide Web
The Services may provide, or third parties may provide, links to other World Wide Web sites or resources, including embedded content from third party providers (including, but not limited to, YouTube, Twitch, content streamers, etc.). Because Chess.com has no control over such sites and resources, you acknowledge and agree that we are not responsible for the availability of such external sites or resources, and does not endorse and is not responsible or liable for any content, advertising, products or other materials on or available from such sites or resources. We do not warrant the suitability of any third-party Content for any particular use or purpose. We do not warrant the accuracy of any third-party advertisements. You further acknowledge and agree that we shall not be responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused or alleged to be caused by or in connection with use of or reliance on any such content, goods or services available on or through any such site or resource.
E. Live Video Chess Play and Classroom Service
Some accounts may have the option to provide other users with the option of participating in live video chess play in the classroom with teachers, coaches, and/or other users by using the Classroom feature. We do not monitor these live sessions. If you choose to use this video play and/or Classroom service, then you are responsible for the activities of all users who access the service or use it through your account and you agree to ensure that any such user will comply with the terms of this Agreement and all of our policies. We assume no responsibility or liability for violations. If you become aware of any violation of this Agreement in connection with the use of the video play and/or Classroom service by any person, please contact us at
https://chess.com/support
. We may investigate any complaints and violations that come to our attention and may take any (or no) action that we believe is appropriate, including, but not limited to issuing warnings, removing the content, prohibiting use of the video play and/or Classroom service by an end user, or terminating an account. We also may provide user information to law enforcement and government agencies in response to valid legal requests consistent with our
Privacy Policy
.
Under no circumstances will Chess.com be liable in any way for any data or content viewed while using the video play and/or Classroom service, including, but not limited to, any errors or omissions in any such data or content, or any loss or damage of any kind incurred as a result of the use of, access to, or denial of access to any data or content.
10. Indemnity
To the maximum extent allowed by law, you agree to indemnify, defend, and hold Chess.com harmless from and against all losses, expenses, damages, and costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees, resulting from: (a) your breach or alleged breach of these Terms; (b) your use of the Services or activities in connection with the Services; (c) your User-Generated Content; (d) your violation of any law, rule or regulation; or (e) your violation of any third-party rights. We reserve the right to assume, at our sole expense, the exclusive defense and control of any matter subject to indemnification by you, in which event you will fully cooperate with us in asserting any available defenses. You will not, in any event, settle any claim without our prior written consent. If any person you authorize to use or access the Services disaffirms any or all of these Terms, you agree to defend, indemnify, and hold us harmless for any damages that we suffer by the person's disaffirmance.
11. Infringement Policy and Reporting Procedure
Chess.com respects the intellectual property rights of others and expects users of the Service to do the same. We comply with the federal Digital Millennium Copyright Act (“DMCA“), the text of which may be found on the U.S. Copyright Office Website at
http://www.copyright.gov/legislation/dmca.pdf
. We will respond to notices of alleged copyright infringement that comply with the DMCA and other applicable law and are properly provided to us; provided that if there is Content associated with an NFT that is infringing, we will use commercially reasonable efforts to prevent such NFT from displaying the infringing content when connected to our Services.
If you believe that any Content has been copied or used in a way that constitutes copyright infringement, please provide us with the following information:
a physical or electronic signature of the copyright owner or a person authorized to act on their behalf;
identification of the copyrighted work claimed to have been infringed;
identification of the material that is claimed to be infringing or to be the subject of infringing activity, and information reasonably sufficient to permit us to locate the material (such as a url);
your contact information, including your address, telephone number, and an email address;
a written statement by you that you have a good faith belief that use of the material in the manner complained of is not authorized by the copyright owner, its agent, or the law; and
a statement that the information in the notification is accurate, and, under penalty of perjury, that you are authorized to act on behalf of the copyright owner.
If you believe that your removed Content is not actually infringing, or that you have the necessary rights to post your Content, please send us a counter-notice containing the following information:
a physical or electronic signature of the copyright owner or a person authorized to act on their behalf;
your physical or electronic signature (with your full legal name);
identification of the Content that has been removed or to which access has been disabled and the location at which the content appeared before it was removed or disabled;
a statement that you have a good faith belief, under penalty of perjury, that the Content was removed or disabled as a result of mistake or a misidentification of the Content; and
your name, address, telephone number, and email address, and a statement that you will accept service of process from the person who provided the original notification of the alleged infringement.
If we receive a counter-notice, we may send a copy of the counter-notice to the person alleging copyright infringement and inform that person that we may replace the removed Content. Unless the original person alleging copyright infringement files an action seeking a court order against the Content provider, member, or user, the removed Content may be replaced, in ten to fourteen business days or more after receipt of the counter-notice, at Chess.com's sole discretion.
Please understand that filing a counter-notification may lead to legal proceedings between you and the complaining party to determine ownership. Be aware that there may be adverse legal consequences in your country if you make a false or bad faith allegation by using this process.
We reserve the right to remove Content alleged to be infringing without prior notice and at our sole discretion. In appropriate circumstances, we also may terminate a user's account if the user is determined to be a repeat infringer. Our designated copyright agent for notice of alleged copyright infringement appearing on the Service is:
Chess.com LLC, Legal
877 E 1200 S #970397
Orem, UT 84097
legal@chess.com
12. Wireless Features
We may offer certain features and services that are available to you via your wireless Internet Device (collectively,
Wireless Features
). Your carrier may charge standard messaging, data, and other fees, which may appear on your wireless bill or be deducted from your prepaid balance. Your carrier may prohibit or restrict certain Wireless Features, and certain Wireless Features may be incompatible with your carrier or wireless Internet Device. You agree that as to the Wireless Features for which you are registered, we may send communications to your wireless Internet Device regarding us or other parties. If you have registered via the Services for Wireless Features, then you agree to notify us of any changes to your wireless number (including phone number) and update your Account to reflect the changes.
13. Submission of Feedback
We welcome feedback, comments and suggestions for improvements to the Services (“
Feedback
“). You acknowledge and expressly agree that any contribution of Feedback does not and will not give or grant you any right, title or interest in the Services or in any such Feedback. All Feedback becomes the sole and exclusive property of Chess.com, and we may use and disclose Feedback in any manner and for any purpose whatsoever without further notice or compensation to you and without retention by you of any proprietary or other right or claim. You hereby assign to Chess.com any and all right, title and interest (including, but not limited to, any patent, copyright, trade secret, trademark, show-how, know-how, moral rights and any and all other intellectual property right) that you may have in and to any and all Feedback.
14. General Provisions
A. Prizes
To play in events with prizes on Chess.com, you must be an adult of legal age as considered by the governing laws of your state or country of residence and comply with your local laws. If you are not of legal age, then your parent or legal guardian must consent to this agreement. Chess.com is not responsible for verifying the legality of your participation in events.
In the event that you win any Prize (monetary, or other) in any Competition (tournament, event, or other) on Chess.com, you hereby acknowledge and consent to our ongoing investigation of your games whether related or unrelated to those occurring within the Competition and that any judgment made as a determination of your eligibility to win any Prize or a disqualification thereof shall lie with Chess.com. We may, at our sole discretion, withhold any and all Prizes won in any Competition on our Site for any period of time pending investigation into your Games. Any decision by Chess.com regarding forfeiture, reduction or cancellation of Prizes in accordance with our Terms of Service shall be final and binding upon you and shall not be subject to review or appeal by you or any third party.
By participating in any Competition you hereby agree to release, discharge and hold harmless our company, its legal representatives, affiliates, subsidiaries, agencies and respective officers, directors, employees and agents, from any costs, expenses damages, losses claims, actions or proceedings brought by you (or any third party on your behalf) (“Claims“), as a result of your participation in the Competition and/or any Prize that may or may not be awarded to you as a result thereof and Chess.com fully excludes any liability in relation to any such Claims.
Chess.com shall not be liable to you for any failure to perform any of our obligations under the Competition or in respect of the Prize where we are unable to do so as a result of circumstances beyond our reasonable control.
You hereby agree to indemnify our company, its legal representatives, affiliates, subsidiaries, agencies and respective officers, directors, employees against all costs, losses, damages, expenses and liabilities (including for loss of reputation and goodwill and professional advisor fees) suffered by Chess.com arising as a result of a breach by you of your obligations under these Rules, our Terms of Service, the Tournament Rules or the Special Terms or in connection with your failure to follow any instructions given by our team or in relation to any matter concerning your participation in a Competition.
In case of disputes or disagreements concerning any aspect of a Competition including but not limited to all matters relating to the awarding of the Prizes, an Entrant's eligibility to participate in the Competition, the conduct of any Entrant, these Rules, our Terms of Service, the Tournament Rules or the Special Terms, the final decision shall lie with our team and any decision by us shall be final and binding upon you and shall not be subject to review or appeal by you or any third party.
Chess.com does not and cannot provide tax advice or legal advice regarding the tax disposition of any Prizes. We may disclose information related to Prizes to any tax authority it deems necessary, including by way of response to a valid request for information by any governmental body making such a request. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, we may or may not provide notice to you of such disclosures in its sole discretion, which may constitute a limitation upon your privacy rights under the GDPR or the analogous data privacy laws of your jurisdiction.
B. NFT Policy
You may be able to buy, sell, trade and transact in NFTs associated with UGA on storefronts and secondary marketplaces via third party platforms or Connected Services (“NFT Platforms“). We are not the seller of any NFT available on NFT Platforms. We do not warrant or endorse and do not assume and will not have any liability or responsibility to you or any other person for any such NFT Platforms. We do not control the actions of such platforms, and make no promises or guarantees of any kind regarding such NFT Platforms or your ability to transaction in NFTs associated with UGA on such NFT Platforms.
You acknowledge and agree that there are risks associated with purchasing and holding NFTs and using blockchain technology. These include, but are not limited to, risk of losing access to NFTs due to loss of private key(s), custodial error or purchase error, risk of mining or blockchain attacks, risk of hacking and security weaknesses, risk of unfavorable regulatory intervention in one or more jurisdictions, risks related to token taxation, risk of personal information disclosure, risk of uninsured losses, unanticipated risks, and volatility risks. Any purchase or sale you make, accept or facilitate outside of the Service will be entirely at your risk. We do not authorize, control or endorse purchases or sales of NFTs outside of the Service. We expressly deny and disclaim any liability to you and deny any obligation to indemnify you or hold you harmless for any losses you may incur by transacting or facilitating transactions in any NFTs outside of the Service.
If you have a dispute with one or more third parties related to a Connected Service or NFT Platform, you release us (and our affiliates and subsidiaries, and our and their respective officers, directors, employees and agents) from claims, demands and damages (actual and consequential) of every kind and nature, known and unknown, arising out of or in any way connected with such disputes. In entering into this release, you expressly waive any protections (whether statutory or otherwise) that would otherwise limit the coverage of this release to include only those claims which you may know or suspect to exist in your favor at the time of agreeing to this release.
C. Termination and Suspension
We reserve the right to discontinue the Services or suspend or terminate your access to it, including any Accounts or User-Generated Content submitted by you, at any time, without notice, for any reason and without any obligation to you or any third party. If any information that you provide, or if we have reasonable grounds to suspect that any information that you provide, is false, inaccurate, or otherwise violates these Terms or any Additional Terms, then we may suspend or terminate your Account or deny you access to all or part of the Services. Any suspension or termination will not affect your obligations to us, including any payment obligations to us, and you will not be entitled to a refund of any payments. Upon suspension or termination of your access to the Services, or upon notice from us, your License to use the Services will terminate immediately.
D. Communications
When you communicate with us electronically, such as via a Services communication tool, you consent to receive communications from us electronically. Please note that we will do our best to respond to your inquiry, but it may take us some time. You agree that all agreements, notices, disclosures, and other communications that we provide to you electronically, satisfy any legal requirement that such communications be in writing.
E. Operation of Services; International Issues
We control and operate the Services from our headquarters in Orem, Utah, USA. If you use the Services from other locations, you are responsible for compliance with applicable local laws regarding your online conduct and acceptable content, if and to the extent local laws apply (for example, any local education, regulatory, or data privacy laws). You and we disclaim any application of the Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods.
F. Severability; Interpretation
If any provision of these Terms, or any Additional Terms, is for any reason deemed unenforceable by a court or arbitrator, you agree that every attempt will be made to give effect to the parties' intentions as reflected in that provision, and the remaining provisions contained in this Agreement will continue in full force and effect. You agree that these Terms, and Additional Terms, will not be construed against us because we drafted them.
G. Assignment
We may assign our rights and obligations under these Terms, or any Additional Terms, in whole or in part, to any party at any time without any notice. These Terms, and any Additional Terms, may not be assigned by you, and you may not delegate your duties under them.
H. No Waiver
No waiver by us of any of these Terms or any Additional Terms will be of any force or effect unless made in writing and signed by a duly authorized officer of Chess.com.
I. Updates to Terms
We reserve the right to modify these Terms, or any Additional Terms, from time to time in our sole discretion (
Updated Terms
). You agree that any Updated Terms will be effective immediately upon our posting them on the Services and, if you have an Account, either by displaying an alert next to the link to the Terms, displaying an alert upon log in to the Services, or by directly communicating them to you (e.g., via the email address associated with your Account or our internal messaging service), provided that: (i) any modification to Section 7 (
Arbitration & Dispute Resolution
) shall not apply to any Dispute initiated prior to the applicable modification; and (ii) any modification to provisions related to fees and billing shall not apply to fees incurred prior to the applicable modification. If you do not cancel your Subscription to the Services within seven days after receiving notice of Updated Terms as described above, or if you continue to use the Services after receiving notice of Updated Terms, then you agree to comply with, and to be bound by, the Updated Terms.
J. Contact Us
We are located in the United States of America. Chess.com operates all our Services. You may contact us below if you have any questions, complaints, or other issues related to these terms and conditions:
Mailing address:
Chess.com LLC
877 E 1200 S #970397
Orem, UT 84097
For any matters contact us at
https://chess.com/support
- Only for legal matters:
legal@chess.com
User Agreement
Privacy Policy
Subscriber Agreement
Fair Play Policy
Community Policy
Competitive Events Policy
Gifting Policy
Giveaways Policy
Courses Terms
Compliance
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.chess.com/legal/privacy:
Home
Play
Puzzles
Learn
Watch
News
Social
More
All Results for
All Results for
Sign Up
Log In
English
Light UI
Dark UI
Support
Last updated: 7/22/2024
Welcome to Chess.com!
This Privacy Policy (“Policy“) outlines how Chess.com collects, uses, protects, and discloses personal information obtained from anyone who uses our Services (“Users“), anyone who creates an account on the Chess.com website or any related content, features, mobile and web applications and other services (collectively the “Services“) which are brought to you by Chess.com, LLC and its affiliate companies.
This Policy addresses requirements in the California Consumer Privacy Act, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act (“CCPA“), as well as any other applicable international, national, and state requirements related to data collection, usage practices, and disclosures.
Please read this Policy closely
. By using the Services, you agree to the handling of your information in accordance with this Policy. If you provide us with your information (directly or indirectly through our service providers) we will treat your information according to this Policy. If we need to use your Personal Information for any other purpose, other than as disclosed herein, we will update this Policy or ask for your previous consent, if necessary.
Summary of Key Points
We encourage you to read this entire Policy and our
Terms of Service
, but here are some key points that may be of your interest:
Personal Information (“PI“) means information that identifies, relates to, describes, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household.
During registration, we may ask you to provide an email address, a username and if registration with a telephone number is available in your country, we will ask you to provide a telephone number.
We will never ask you to provide us with sensitive PI.
Paying Users are asked for payment information when they purchase anything from our Services. Please see Section “Information Collection“ for more information about how we safeguard payment information.
Because the security of your PI is important to us, we only ask for PI where it serves a business purpose and try to limit the collection of PI to only what is necessary to accomplish those purposes. We also use commercially reasonable physical, technical, and administrative security measures designed to safeguard all information collected by the Services.
Table of Contents
1.
Definitions
2.
Children's Privacy
3.
Information Collection
4.
How We Use Information
5.
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
6.
How to Exercise your Right to Access, Change or Correct your Information
7.
How to Exercise your Rights to Cancel and Delete your Account and How to Request Reactivation
8.
California Privacy Rights Act (CPRA)
9.
Additional Information regarding Personal Data processed subject to the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
10.
Other Region and State-Specific Terms
11.
Links to Other Services
12.
Location of Information Processing
13.
Security
14.
Changes to Our Privacy Policy
15.
Contact Us
16.
Chess Play & Learn (Arcade Version)
1. Definitions
GDPR
GDPR collectively refers to the European Union (“EU“) and the United Kingdom (“UK“) General Data Protection Regulations.
Personal Data
Personal Data, as that term is defined in the GDPR, means any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person. An identifiable natural person is one who can be identified, directly or indirectly, in particular by reference to an identifier such as a name, an identification number, location data, an online identifier or to one or more factors specific to the physical, physiological, genetic, mental, economic, cultural or social identity of that natural person. Personal Data and Personal Information will be used as synonyms for the purposes of this Policy.
Usage Data
Usage Data is data collected automatically either generated by the use of the Service or from the Service infrastructure itself (for example, the duration of a page visit). Usage Data may include pseudonymous data where applicable.
Cookies
Cookies and/ or similar technologies (collectively referred to as “Cookies“): are small pieces of data stored on your device (computer or mobile device).
Data Controller
Data Controller: means the natural or legal person who (either alone or jointly or in common with other persons) determines the purposes for which and the manner in which any PI is, or is to be, processed. For the purpose of this Policy, we are a Data Controller of your Personal Data.
Data Processors
Data Processors: means any natural or legal person who processes the data on behalf of the Data Controller and follow their instructions, normally it refers to our service providers. We use the services of various Data Processors in order to process your data more effectively.
Data Subject
Data Subject is any living individual whose Personal Data we process.
2. Children's Privacy
Chess.com is not targeted towards minors, meaning a person under the minimum age required to consent to the processing of their personal information as determined by applicable laws in their state or country of residence. Our platform at
ChessKid.com
is targeted towards minors.
3. Information Collection
There are two general categories of information that we collect.
A. Information Users Provide to Us
As more fully set forth below, we and our third-party service providers collect information that Users provide when using the Services, including when Users create an Account, sign up for Services, or contact us with a question, comment, or request.
To register an Account, Users are asked to provide a username, an email address, and/or telephone number (which is optional if you choose to register with an email).
We also allow Users to register an Account by connecting with an external third-party service such as Google, Apple, or Facebook. If you choose this way of registration, we may receive your PI from these third parties including but not limited to your name, email address, and contacts.
Users are also able to complete their profile with additional information which is optional such as: first and last name, location, country, language, content language, timezone, OTB rating, status, profile picture and any other information the User chooses to share in the “About me“ section of the profile. The flag of the country you choose will appear on your profile.
Keep in mind that certain information from your profile is public and therefore can be accessed by any User, and even by people outside Chess.com. By including information in your profile, you understand that the information that is public can be used by any person or entity for their own purposes.
There is also other information provided that depends on the type of Account. For example:
Payment information such as credit or debit card information and billing address is collected from Users who purchase a subscription, including those who gift a paid Account to others, unless Users are purchasing through iTunes, PayPal, or other similar mechanisms with which we integrate. For your security, we do not store your credit card number in our databases but we and our payment service providers may retain only the first six digits and/or last four digits to identify your Account and respond to your requests and questions and to process the payment.
In addition, Users can provide us with information through separate sections of the Services. These sections, accessible via the Menu or Settings link on the Services, allow Users to administer their Accounts, including when they provide testimonials, seek customer support, or submit comments or questions.
If you submit any information relating to other people in connection with the Services, you represent that you have the authority to do so and permit us to use the information in accordance with this Policy.
When you contact us directly by any means we will collect your email address, name and any information you provide.
When we embed or display content from YouTube on our Services, we are using YouTube API Services. In these cases, we collect, store, and use User information related to YouTube API services. By accessing YouTube content on our Services, you agree to be bound by YouTube terms of service, found at
https://www.youtube.com/static?template=terms
.
If you want to revoke this access to your data, you can do so via the Google security settings page at
https://security.google.com/settings/security/permissions
.
YouTube is a service provided by Google. For more information about how Google collects and uses data, please refer to the Google Privacy Policy at
http://www.google.com/policies/privacy
.
B. Information We Collect from Users
We and our third-party service providers collect PI directly from Users of the Services in the form of the actions they take and activities they complete when using the Services. For example, from all Users, we may collect information about patterns of usage and order history.
We and our third-party service providers also use a variety of technologies, such as Cookies, to automatically collect certain technical information from your computer or mobile device over time and across different websites.
We and our third-party service providers may use the information collected through these technical methods for several purposes, including delivering content, tracking and enhancing our Users' experience with the Services, and delivering advertising to visitors of our Services when they visit other websites and applications. For example, when you return to the Services after logging in, Cookies help the Services recognize who you are without having to log back in. More information about the use of Cookies is set forth below.
We collect several different types of information for various purposes to provide and improve our Service to you.
Types of Data Collected
1. PI
While using our Service, we may collect certain PI which may include but is not limited to:
Required Information (username, email address, or telephone number, as applicable)
Optional Information (first and last name, location, country, language, content language, timezone, OTB rating, status, profile picture and any other information the User chooses to share in the “About me“ section of the profile)
Public available chess records from FIDE (Fédération Internationale des Échecs)
We may use your PI to contact you with newsletters, marketing or promotional materials and other information that may be of interest to you, we will ask for your previous consent, if that is required by the applicable legislation. You may opt-out of receiving any, or all, of these communications from us by following the unsubscribe link or instructions provided in any email we send, by changing your notification settings in your profile or by contacting us.
If you use our App for the Apple or Android platform, we may ask, with your permission, to collect your contact list information (including email addresses and phone numbers) to share with Apple or Google for the exclusive purpose of finding your friends and connections.
If you participate in one of our chess competitions with prizes, you may be required to install software that monitors your activity on your computer or device. This software may log your device processes and tabs, record your device screen, access your webcam(s) and video, record your input and output audio, and track your mouse or cursor movement. This PI will be collected and disclosed to a third-party to conduct the competition, to prevent, detect and investigate violations of the competition's rules and our Fair Play Policy as further described in Section 5 (When We Disclose Information to Third Parties).
We also collect Usage Data and Cookies Data, as described below in separate sections.
2. Usage Data
We may also collect information that your browser sends to us whenever you visit our Service or when you access the Service through a mobile device (“Usage Data“).
This Usage Data may include information such as your Internet Protocol address (e.g., IP address), browser type, browser version, the pages of our Service that you visit, the time and date of your visit, the time spent on those pages, unique device identifiers, your country, your chess statistics and other diagnostic data.
When you access the Service by or through a mobile device, this Usage Data may include information such as your browser type, operating system, device type, the page served, your IP address, how you got to our Website, the time and length of your visit, your language preferences, your approximate geolocation, and the websites you visited prior to visiting the Services. When you download and use one of our Apps, we and our service providers may track and collect App usage data, such as the date and time the App on your device accesses our servers and what information and files have been downloaded to the App based on your device number.
3. Cookies Data
We use Cookies to provide you with the Services, to track the activity on our Service and to hold certain information. We use the following types of Cookies to recognize your device and to provide and improve our Services:
Essential Cookies
These Cookies are essential to provide you with services available through the Services and enable you to use some of its features. For example, they allow you to log in to secure areas of our Services and help the content of pages you request load quickly. Without these Cookies, the Services that you have asked for cannot be provided, and we only use these Cookies to provide you with those Services. You may not disable these types of Cookies.
Functionality Cookies
These Cookies allow us to remember choices you make when you use our Services, such as remembering your language preferences, remembering your login details, and remembering the changes you make to other parts of Services which you can customize. The purpose of these Cookies is to provide you with a more personal experience and to avoid you having to reenter your preferences every time you visit our Services.
Analytics and Performance Cookies
These Cookies are used to collect information about traffic to our Services and how Users use the Services. It includes the number of visitors to our Services, the websites that referred them to our Services, the pages they visited on our Services, what time of day they visited our Services, whether they have visited our Services before, and other similar information. We use this information to help operate our Services more efficiently, to gather broad demographic information, and to monitor the level of activity on our Services.
Social Media Cookies
These Cookies are used when you share information using a social media sharing button or “like“ button on our Services or engage with our content on or through a social networking website such as Facebook, Twitter, or Google+ and also if you choose to sign up using your social media account. These cookies are also placed on your browser if you access to a section of our Services that provides you with embedded videos from Youtube, Twitch or other third-party websites. Some of these cookies may be considered essential if you log in using your social media account.
Targeting Cookies
Targeting Cookies are used to serve you with advertisements that may be relevant to you and your interests. Third parties might use information gathered by cookies and/or web beacons for the purpose of online behavioral advertising. The types of information that is gathered by third party cookies and/or web beacons as well as the purpose(s) for which this information is used, are set out in the privacy policy of said third parties which we encourage you to review. Chess.com declines all and any liability for any third party cookies or web beacons deployed by third parties for whatever purpose.
Google, as a third-party vendor, uses cookies to serve ads on our Service. Google's use of the DoubleClick cookie enables it and its partners to serve ads to our users based on their visit to our Service or other websites on the Internet. You may opt-out of the use of the DoubleClick Cookie for interest-based advertising by visiting the Google Ads Settings web page:
http://www.google.com/ads/preferences
.
Depending on your country of residence, you may allow or reject the use of non-essential Cookies when using our Services by changing your Cookie preferences
here
. However, please note that if you reject or block certain categories of Cookies from the Services, the Services may not function as intended. For example, you will not be able to remain logged into your Account, and therefore you would have to log in during each page transition.
You may also opt-out of the use of your PI for interest based advertising by visiting
Your ad choices
,
Your online choices
,
Transparent advertising
,
LiveRamp opt out
or
NAI Consumer opt out
.
4. How We Use Information
We and our third-party service providers may use the information collected from Users as follows:
To permit you to register and use the Services, including, for example, to send you communications about your Account, or to allow you to provide feedback through the Support or Contact Us Sections. (Lawful Basis: to comply with our legal obligations and performance of our contract with you)
To complete and fulfill your purchase, such as to process your payments, communicate with you regarding your purchase, and provide you with related customer service. (Lawful Basis: performance of our contract with you, to comply with our legal obligations and necessary for our legitimate interests)
To respond to your inquiries and fulfill your requests, retrieve your password, or provide technical support. (Lawful Basis: performance of our contract with you, to comply with our legal obligations and necessary for our legitimate interests)
To provide you with information, newsletters, marketing communications, publications and other communication via various mediums to keep you informed (Lawful Basis: your consent, performance of our contract with you and necessary for our legitimate interests)
To deliver our advertising to you based on your visits to the Services. (Lawful Basis: your consent and necessary for our legitimate interests)
To measure the effectiveness of our advertising. (Lawful Basis: performance of our contract with you and necessary for our legitimate interests)
To allow us to assess and improve the Services, its educational content, and other services we provide (for example, to improve our content and User experience); to research, evaluate, and improve the educational efficacy of the Services; and to inform our understanding of the Services' User base. (Lawful Basis: performance of our contract with you and necessary for our legitimate interests)
To verify your identity or conduct appropriate checks for fraud prevention and detection (Lawful Basis: to comply with our legal obligations and necessary for our legitimate interests)
To customize, adapt, and personalize Users' viewing and content-consumption experience. (Lawful Basis: performance of our contract with you, your consent and necessary for our legitimate interests)
To maintain and analyze the functioning of the Services. (Lawful Basis: necessary for our legitimate interests)
To manage and conduct our business (Lawful Basis: performance of our contract with you and necessary for our legitimate interests)
As we believe to be necessary or appropriate: (a) to comply with applicable law, including laws outside your country of residence; (b) to comply with legal process; (c) to respond to requests from public and governmental authorities, including authorities outside your country of residence; (d) to detect violations of and enforce our terms and conditions; (e) to protect our operations or those of any of our affiliates, including the security of the Services; (f) to protect our rights, privacy, safety, or property, or that of our affiliates, you, or others; and (g) to allow us to pursue available remedies or limit the damages that we may sustain (collectively, (a)-(g) are
Other Uses and Disclosures
). (Lawful Basis: to comply with our legal obligations and necessary for our legitimate interests)
To send you push notifications, SMS, alerts and or other types of notifications on your mobile device. You may choose to stop receiving push notifications at any time by changing the settings on your mobile device. If you provide us with your mobile phone number, we may send you SMS text messages about your account with your previous consent if required by law. Please note that your carrier may charge you for the text messages you receive. To permanently stop receiving SMS text messages from us (if you are located in the U.S. or Canada) text STOP, CANCEL, or UNSUBSCRIBE in reply to any SMS text message sent by us. (Lawful Basis: performance of our contract with you, to comply with our legal obligations and necessary for our legitimate interests)
To research and develop new products and services (Lawful Basis: performance of our contract with you and necessary for our legitimate interests)
To publish your name in case you are the winner of a contest, sweepstake, tournament or events in general. (Lawful Basis: performance of our contract with you, your consent and necessary for our legitimate interests)
For administrative purposes (Lawful Basis: performance of our contract with you and necessary for our legitimate interests)
To conduct our competitive events and to prevent, detect and investigate violations of our Fair Play Policy, Competitive Events Policy and the rules of any event organized by us. (Lawful Basis: performance of our contract with you, to comply with our legal obligations, your consent and necessary for our legitimate interests)
To carry out any other purpose described to you at the time the information was collected.
5. When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
Information collected from Users will not be disclosed except for the following purposes, which include our operations purposes:
To service providers such as payment processors, financial institutions, technological, analytical, marketing, advertising service providers and partners and third party professional advisors (i.e., auditors, law firms, etc.), provided that, the service providers agree to keep the information confidential.
To our affiliates and business partners and their employees for business purposes, when necessary for the purpose of the provision of our services or when such affiliates provide services to us.
As needed to conduct our competitive events and to prevent, detect and investigate violations of our Fair Play Policy, Competitive Events Policy and the rules of any competitive event organized by us.
As we believe to be necessary or appropriate as set forth above in Other Uses and Disclosures.
With government bodies and law enforcement or where we believe that disclosure is in accordance with, or required by, any applicable law or legal process, including lawful requests by public authorities to meet national security or law enforcement requirements. If required or permitted to do so under the law, and if deemed necessary or warranted, we may provide notice to Users prior to the disclosure.
Subject to confidentiality agreements, the terms of this Policy, and applicable law, information may be disclosed to service providers, advisers, potential transactional partners, or other third parties in connection with the consideration, negotiation, or completion of a corporate transaction in which we or any of our affiliates are acquired by or merged with another company, or we sell, liquidate, transfer, or license all or a portion of our assets in bankruptcy or otherwise. This means that if some or all our assets are acquired or otherwise transferred or licensed, including in bankruptcy, that such acquirer shall be subject to the same commitments stated under this Policy.
We may use third-party advertising networks and other affiliates in association with cookies, pixel tags, IFrames or similar technologies to: (1) deliver interest-based advertising to those Users, including our advertising, when those Users visit third-party websites; and (2) provide us with statistics about the effectiveness of our advertising on third-party websites. These third-party advertising networks may use this cookie information in accordance with their own privacy policies.
To provide you with relevant content and personalized advertisements, we may share information that we collect from you, such as your phone number, email address (in hashed form), IP address or information about your browser or operating system, with advertising service providers and its affiliates, which may in turn link demographic or interest-based information to you. If you are in the EU and wish to opt-out of this use, you can go
here
and reject the cookies categorized under advertising.
To a third-party that uses or supports referral links to our Services only if you click on a referral link.
Any third-party where such disclosure is required in order to enforce or apply our Terms of Service or other relevant agreements.
Any third-party if necessary to protect the rights, property, integrity or security of our company, our customers, or others (including, without limitation, you).
For service efficiency purposes, some of these affiliates and third parties are located in territories outside the EU/EEA, and from time to time we may transfer your personal data to a third country not being approved by the European Commission as a safe country for such transfer (adequacy decision). If you are a EU/EEA resident and whenever applicable we will use the Standard Contractual Clauses to ensure an equivalent level of protection as granted within the EU/EEA or other lawful grounds for carrying out said transfer.
6. How to Exercise your Right to Access, Change or Correct your Information
Any User can review or change the information they provided when they registered for the Services by updating the information on their Account profile or by contacting
Support
. You also can exercise your right of access by requesting it on the “
My data
“ Section of our Services. In addition, Users may contact us at any time as described in Section “Contact Us“ below, to request that we provide for their review any PI they have provided, or to cease collecting PI from the User.
When we change any PI at your request, we will make reasonable efforts to make the changes in our then-active databases as soon as reasonably practicable and always within the applicable legal term. Changing setting options may not result in immediate changes to the settings, which are subject to our operations and maintenance schedules.
7. How to Exercise your Rights to Cancel and Delete your Account and How to Request Reactivation
Users may cancel their Accounts at any time by using the “
Manage Account
“ section in the settings or by contacting
Support
.
Please bear in mind that after an Account is canceled, the PI and other Account information is not deleted permanently. We store the User information to allow the User to reopen their Account at any time. However, we provide no guarantee, and shall have no liability or obligation to ensure, that all Account Information and Services-related progress will be available or accessible or all learning or personalization features will be able to be recovered or resumed.
Upon Account cancellation or execution of a deletion request (as explained below), anonymized User information may nonetheless persist internally in our backup, archive files or similar databases, and may still be used anonymized, for our internal support, administrative, and record-keeping purposes including, but not limited to, allowing us to improve the Services and other services we provide through research, evaluation, and analytics as permissible by applicable law and for other purposes specifically outlined in this Policy. We may also keep certain information in backup or archive records if required by law or if it is relevant to preventing fraud or future violations of our policies or for legitimate business purposes when permitted by applicable law. All retained data will continue to be subject to our Policy in effect at that time
Following cancellation of an Account, to reactivate your Account and potentially recover previous information and resume where the relevant User left off you will need to request it to
Support
using the email address associated with your Account.
If you want to permanently delete your PI you can request it manually by clicking on “Delete“ on the “
My Data
“ section of the Services or by requesting deletion to
Support
. In this case, we will delete your PI, anonymize the information that will remain public such as games statistics, posts and comments, and block your email address and social media accounts from being used on Chess.com in the future.
If you want your posts and public comments to be removed, you must delete them separately before requesting deletion. After you delete your personal data, Chess.com Support Staff will have no means to verify your identity and will not remove these posts for you.
Any data deletion requests will be executed within the term provided by the applicable law.
Please keep in mind that a request to delete PI may lead to cancellation of your Account or the inability to use certain Services, and if any other Account type is linked to a Member Account, a request to delete PI in one of the Accounts may be reflected in your other Account.
8. California Privacy Rights (CPRA)
This Section supplements the information contained in our Policy and applies solely to Users who reside in the State of California. We adopt this notice to comply with the CCPA. Any terms used in this Section have the same meaning as defined in the CCPA. Please note that we may claim legal exemptions for certain types of PI and certain of our Services from all or certain parts of the CCPA.
The CCPA provides California residents with specific rights regarding their PI. This section describes your CCPA rights and explains how to exercise those rights. In this section “you“ or “your“ refers to California residents. Under the CCPA, we are required to disclose the categories of sources from whom we collect PI, and the third parties with whom we share it -- which we already have explained above in Section “Information Collection“, Section “How We Use Information“, and Section “When We Disclose Information to Third Parties“.
We do not have actual knowledge that we “sell” or “share” (as those terms are defined under the CCPA and used throughout this section) personal information of residents under 16 years of age. However, we have, in the preceding 12 months, sold and/or shared the phone numbers, email addresses (in hashed form), IP addresses or  browser or operating system information of California residents to advertising service providers and their affiliates for the business purpose of providing personalized content and advertising.
Only you as a California resident or a person registered with the California Secretary of State that you authorize to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable consumer request related to your PI.
The verifiable consumer request must:
Provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected PI or an authorized representative. We will verify your request by asking you to provide information related to your interactions with us. We will not otherwise ask for PI from you that we would not otherwise maintain as part of us providing our Services.
Describe your request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate, and respond to it.
We cannot respond to your request or provide you with PI if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the PI relates to you. Making a verifiable consumer request does not require you to create an Account with us. We will only use PI provided in a verifiable consumer request to verify the requestor's identity or authority to make the request.
To exercise your rights please follow the steps described below, or request it to us by contacting
Support
or by following the steps described below:
Right to access PI
. You may be entitled to receive information regarding the categories of PI we collected, the sources from which we collected PI, the purposes for which we collected and shared PI, the categories of PI that we share and the categories of third parties to whom the PI was shared with, and the categories of PI that we disclosed for a business purpose in the last 12 months. You can exercise this right by requesting it on the “
My data
“ Section of our Services.
Right to data portability
. You may be entitled to receive a copy of your electronic PI in a readily usable format so you can transmit this data to another organization. You may only make a verifiable consumer request for access or data portability twice within a 12-month period. You can exercise this right by requesting it on the “
My data
“ Section of our Services.
Right to Correct
. You have the right to request that we correct inaccurate PI that we maintain about you. You are also able to correct any inaccurate PI manually by accessing your profile on the
Settings
sections of the Services.
Right to deletion
. You may be entitled to request that we delete the PI that we have collected from you. We will use commercially reasonable efforts to honor your request, in compliance with applicable laws. Please note, however, that we may need or be required to keep such information for our legitimate business purposes or to comply with applicable law. To know how to exercise your right to deletion, please refer to the section titled: “Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion“ from this Policy.
Right to opt-out of certain sharing with third parties
. If you are a California resident, you have the right to request us to not disclose your PI to third parties for monetary or other valuable consideration or also known as the right to “
Not Sell or Share My Personal Information
”
You can exercise such right to opt-out by submitting the following
form
.
“Do Not Track“ Signals
We do not respond to Do Not Track (“DNT“) signals received from web browsers. Do Not Track is a preference you can set in your web browser to inform websites that you do not want to be tracked.
You can enable or disable Do Not Track by visiting the Preferences or Settings page of your web browser. If you enable DNT functionality on any device, some of the Services, including paid Services or Chess.com subscriptions, may become unstable.
a. Information We Collect and Share
We have collected the following categories of PI from or about consumers within the last 12 months:
Personal Information Category
PI we collect in this Category
Sources of PI
Identifiers
A real name or alias
Internet Protocol address(es)
Email address
Account name (username), or other similar identifier
Mobile push tokens
Specific third-party identifiers relating to chess services (e.g., USCF or FIDE ID number) may be collected for some accounts
Information you provide us
Information we collect from you automatically
3rd Party Service Provider
Geolocation Data
IP address data
Information we collect from you automatically
Internet or other similar network activity
Browsing history;  information on a User’s interaction with the Services; information regarding your operating system and device
Information we collect from you automatically
3rd Party Service Provider
For additional information regarding the PI we collect and have collected in the 12 months preceding the effective date of our Policy, the heading above styled “Types of Data Collected“ under Section 3.B. (Information We Collect from Users).“
b. Business and Commercial Purposes for Which We Use PI
We may use or disclose the PI we collect from each of the Categories of PI (described in the table above) for one or more of the following purposes:
See Section 3 above (How We Use Information).
c. Categories of PI We Share:
We may share your PI by disclosing it to a third party for a business purpose described below. We only make these business purpose disclosures under written contracts that describe the purposes, require the recipient to keep the PI confidential, and prohibit using the disclosed information for any purpose except performing the contract.
In the preceding 12 months, we have also disclosed the following categories of PI for one or more business purposes:
We share Category A, B, and C Personal Information with our Affiliates, partners, parent/subsidiary organizations, service providers, and government entities and advertising networks.
d. Our Retention of PI
We retain PI for as long as necessary to provide the Services and fulfill the transactions you have requested, or for other business purposes, to comply with our legal obligations, resolving disputes, and enforcing our agreements. We decide how long we need PI on a case-by-case basis. We may consider the following factors when making retention decisions:
Whether we need to keep some of your PI to maintain your Account;
Whether we are required by law to keep some types of PI for certain periods of time to comply with our legal obligations; and
Whether we need some of your PI for other business purposes, such as to prevent harm and ensure safety and security of our Sites; investigate possible violations of our terms and conditions of use; or protect ourselves.
e. Non-Discrimination
We fully support your privacy rights and will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your CCPA rights.
f. Notice of Financial Incentives
We may offer special incentives to Users who enroll in certain promotions. The availability of these promotions to you at any given time will vary. If we offer such programs, we may ask for your PI as a prerequisite to your participation in the promotion.
9. Additional Information regarding Personal Data Processed subject to the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
If you are located in the EEA or the UK, our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Data described in this Policy depends on the Personal Data we collect and the specific context in which we collect it.
The purpose of this section of this Policy is to explain how you may exercise certain of your rights under applicable data privacy laws related to that information. This policy identifies our legal representative and Data Protection Office in the EEA and UK and provides you with the information that you may need to contact them. We (Chess.com, LLC) are the data controller for the processing of your information. Please see Section “Contact Us“ below for our contact details.
Our legal representative in the European Union is Chessable Spain S.L.
Contact:
dpo@chess.com
Postal Address: Av. Diagonal 618, 5B, 08021, Barcelona, Spain.
Our legal representative in the United Kingdom is Chessable Ltd.
Contact:
dpo@chess.com
Postal Address: London Mindsports Centre, 21-23 Dalling Road, Hammersmith, London, W6 0JD.
a. Retention of Data
We will retain your Personal Data only for as long as necessary for the purposes set out in this Policy. We will retain and use your Personal Data to the extent necessary to comply with our legal obligations (for example, if we are required to retain your data to comply with applicable laws), resolve disputes, and enforce our legal agreements and policies, or until you instruct us to do otherwise in a fashion consistent with your rights (and our obligations) under the GDPR.
b. Transfer Of Data
Your information, including Personal Data, may be transferred to --- and maintained on --- servers located outside of your state, province, country or other governmental jurisdiction where the data protection laws may differ than those from your jurisdiction.
If you are located outside the United States and choose to provide information to us, please note that we are a United States based provider. Therefore, we operate our Services, collect and process your Personal Data from the United States.
We will take all steps reasonably necessary to ensure that your data is treated securely and in accordance with this Policy and no transfer of your Personal Data will take place to an organization or a country unless there are adequate controls in place including the security of your Personal Data. If we onward transfer your Personal Data outside the EEA or the UK, we rely on the European Commission's standard contractual clauses and the UK Information Commissioner's equivalent transfer mechanism, as relevant. This is unless the transfer is to a country that has been determined by the European Commission or the relevant UK authorities, as applicable, to provide an adequate level of protection for individuals' Personal Data.
c. Your Data Protection Rights Under the GDPR
If you are located in the EEA or the UK, then you have certain data protection rights. We aim to take reasonable steps to allow you to correct, amend, delete, or limit the use of your Personal Data.
If you wish to be informed on what Personal Data we hold about you or if you want it to be removed from our systems, please contact us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below.
You can edit your Account information at any time. In certain circumstances, you have the following data protection rights:
The right to access and to data portability
. You have the right to be provided with a copy of the information we have on you in a structured, machine-readable and commonly used format. You can exercise this right by requesting it on the “
My data
“ Section of our Services
The right to update, correct and rectify your personal data
. You are also able to update, correct or rectify any inaccurate Personal Data manually by accessing your profile on the
Settings
sections of the Services.
The right to delete the information we have on you
. To know how to exercise your right to deletion, please refer to the section titled: “Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion“ from this Policy.
The right to object
. You have the right to object to our processing of your Personal Data. You can do it by contacting us via the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“.
The right to object to marketing
. You can object to marketing at any time by opting-out using the unsubscribe/ opt-out function displayed in our communications to you or by managing your preferences on the
Notifications
section from the Settings.
The right of restriction
. You have the right to request that we restrict the processing of your Personal Data if this is applicable by contacting us via the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“.
The right to withdraw consent
. You also have the right to withdraw your consent at any time where we relied on your consent to process your Personal Data by contacting us via the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“.
Manage your cookie consent
. Depending on your country of residence, you may allow or reject the use of non-essential Cookies when using our Services by changing your Cookie preferences
here
.
If you are unable to perform these actions yourself or if you have any complaints about how we process your Personal Data please contact us via the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“ to assist you.
Please note that we may ask you to verify your identity before responding to such requests. Some of these rights only apply in certain circumstances and in many cases, are limited by law. For example, where fulfilling your request will adversely affect other individuals or our trade secrets or intellectual property, where there are overriding public interest reasons or where we are required by law to retain your Personal Data. We will respond to your requests to exercise these rights as required by applicable law.
You also have the right to complain to a Data Protection Authority about our collection and use of your Personal Data. However, we invite you to contact us with any concern, as we would be happy to try to resolve it directly. For more information, please contact (a) your local data protection authority in the EEA country in which you reside or work, or where you think an infringement of data protection laws occurred or (b) the UK Information Commissioner's Office, as applicable to you.
d. Appointment of the Data Protection Officer
Josh Levine is our GDPR Data Protection Officer. The Data Protection Officer may be contacted at dpo@chess.com.
10. Other Region and State-Specific Terms
a. United States
(1) Colorado Residents
Scope
. This section applies only to Colorado residents. It describes how we collect, use, and share Personal Data of Colorado residents in our capacity as a business under the Colorado Privacy Rights Act (“CPA“) and your rights with respect to that Personal Data. For purposes of this section, the term “Personal Data“ has the meaning given in the CPA but does not include information exempted from the scope of the CPA. Please note that we may claim legal exemptions for certain types of Personal Data and certain of our Services from all or certain parts of the CPA.
Your Colorado privacy rights
. As a Colorado resident, you have the rights listed below. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Access
. You may request confirmation whether we are processing your Personal Data and access to such Personal Data by requesting it on the “
My data
“ Section of our Services.
Correction
. You can edit and correct your Personal Data at any time by by accessing your profile on the
Settings
sections of the Services.
Deletion
. You may have the right, under certain circumstances, to request that we delete the Personal Data you have provided to us. To know how to exercise your right to deletion, please refer to the section titled: “Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion“ from this Policy or contact us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below.
Data portability
. You may be entitled to receive a copy of your electronic Personal Data in a readily usable format. You can exercise this right by requesting it on the “
My data
“ Section of our Services.
Opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes
. If available in your residence or if mandated by law, you may be able to submit requests to opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes by clicking on the following
link
.
Opt-out of profiling
. You have the right to opt-out of the automated processing of your Personal Data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal aspects related to your economic situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements, to the extent this results in decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects. However, we do not perform this type of profiling.
Sensitive Personal Data
. We will not process your sensitive Personal Data without your consent.
Non-discrimination
. You have the right to be free from discrimination related to your exercise of any of your Colorado privacy rights.
Authentication
. In order to protect your Personal Data from unauthorized access or deletion, we may require you to verify your credentials before you can submit a rights request. If you do not have an Account with us, or if we suspect that your Account has been accessed without your authorization, we may ask you to provide additional PI for verification. If we are subsequently unable to confirm your identity, we may refuse your rights request.
(2) Connecticut Residents
Scope
. This section applies only to Connecticut residents. It describes how we collect, use, and share Personal Data of Connecticut residents in our capacity as a business under the Connecticut Data Privacy Act (“CDPA“) and your rights with respect to that Personal Data. For purposes of this section, the term “Personal Data“ has the meaning given in the CDPA but does not include information exempted from the scope of the CDPA. Please note that we may claim legal exemptions for certain types of Personal Data and certain of our Services from all or certain parts of the CDPA.
Your Connecticut privacy rights. As a Connecticut resident, you have the rights listed below. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Access
. You may request a copy of the Personal Data by requesting it on the “
My data
“ Section of our Services.
Correction
. You can edit and correct your Personal Data at any time by by accessing your profile on the
Settings
sections of the Services.
Deletion
. You may have the right, under certain circumstances, to request that we delete the Personal Data you have provided to us. To know how to exercise your right to deletion, please refer to the section titled: “Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion“ from this Policy or contact us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below..
Data portability
. You may be entitled to receive a copy of your electronic Personal Data in a readily usable format. You can exercise this right by requesting it on the “
My data
“ Section of our Services
Opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes
. If available in your residence or if mandated by law, you may be able to submit requests to opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes by clicking on the following
link
.
Opt-out of profiling
. You have the right to opt-out of the automated processing of your Personal Data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal aspects related to your economic situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements, to the extent this results in decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects. However, we do not perform this type of profiling.
Sensitive Personal Data
. We will not process your sensitive Personal Data without your consent.
Non-discrimination
. You have the right to be free from discrimination related to your exercise of any of your Connecticut privacy rights.
Authentication
. In order to protect your Personal Data from unauthorized access or deletion, we may require you to verify your credentials before you can submit a rights request. If you do not have an account with us, or if we suspect that your account has been accessed without your authorization, we may ask you to provide additional Personal Data for verification. If we are subsequently unable to confirm your identity, we may refuse your rights request.
(3) Virginia Residents
Scope
. This section applies only to Virginia residents. It describes how we collect, use, and share Personal Data of Virginia residents in our capacity as a business under the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (“
VCDPA
“) and your rights with respect to that Personal Data. For purposes of this section, the term “
Personal Data
“ has the meaning given in the VCDPA but does not include information exempted from the scope of the VCDPA. Please note that we may claim legal exemptions for certain types of PI and certain of our Services from all or certain parts of the VCDPA.
Your Virginia privacy rights
. As a Virginia resident, you have the rights listed below. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Know
. You have a right to know whether we are processing your Personal Data.
Access
. You may request a copy of the Personal Data by requesting it on the “
My data
“ Section of our Services.
Correction
. You can edit and correct your Personal Data at any time by by accessing your profile on the
Settings
sections of the Services.
Deletion
. You may have the right, under certain circumstances, to request that we delete the Personal Data you have provided to us. To know how to exercise your right to deletion, please refer to the section titled: “Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion“ from this Policy or contact us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below.
Opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes
. If available in your residence or if mandated by law, you may be able to submit requests to opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes by clicking on the following
link
.
Opt-out of profiling
. You have the right to opt-out of the automated processing of your Personal Data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal aspects related to your economic situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements, to the extent this results in decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects. However, we do not perform this type of profiling.
Sensitive Personal Data
. We will not process your sensitive Personal Data without your consent.
Non-discrimination
. You have the right to be free from discrimination related to your exercise of any of your Virginia privacy rights.
Authentication. In order to protect your Personal Data from unauthorized access or deletion, we may require you to verify your credentials before you can submit a rights request. If you do not have an account with us, or if we suspect that your account has been accessed without your authorization, we may ask you to provide additional Personal Data for verification. If we are subsequently unable to confirm your identity, we may refuse your rights request.
b. Australia
If you are a resident of Australia, you may have the following rights and choices:
Update your privacy settings
. You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings
Manage marketing communications from us
. To update your marketing communication preferences, you can contact us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below.
Access, Correction or Deletion
. You may request to access, to correct or to delete your PI. You can edit and correct your PI at any time by changing it directly in our Services. To make a request for access you may do it by requesting it on the “
My data
“ Section of our Services. To know how to exercise your right to deletion, please refer to the section titled: “Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion“ from this Policy or contact us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below.
Objection and Restriction
. You may object to our processing of your PI, including for marketing purposes, or ask us to restrict processing of your PI. To object to data processing or request a restriction, contact us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below. If you request that we stop processing some or all of your PI or you withdraw (where applicable) your consent for our use or disclosure of your PI for purposes set out in this privacy notice, we might not be able to provide you all of the Services and customer support offered to our users and authorized under this Notice.
c. Brazil
Legal Basis of Processing
We use your PI only as permitted by law. Applicable Brazil data protection law requires us to have a “legal basis“ for each purpose for which we collect your PI. Our legal basis for collecting and using the PI described in this Privacy Statement will depend on the type of PI and the specific context in which we collect it. However, we will normally process PI from you when:
We have your consent to do so;
We have a contract with you and it is necessary to process your PI to perform our contract with you, including to provide you with the benefits of our Services and operate our business;
The processing is in our legitimate business interests, such as operating our businesses, improving and developing Services, communicating with you, marketing our offerings and services, and personalizing your experience, and to detect illegal activities; and/or
To comply with legal requirements, including applicable laws and regulations.
Sharing with Credit Bureaus
Inapplicable.
If you are a resident of Brazil, you may have the following rights and choices:
Update your privacy settings
. You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings
Manage marketing communications from us
. To update your marketing communication preferences, you can change your notification preferences by going to the “Settings“ section on your account.
Access, Correction, Anonymization or Deletion
. You may request to access, to correct, anonymize or to delete your PI. You can edit and correct your PI at any time by changing it directly in our Services. To make a request for access you may do it by requesting it on the “
My data
“ Section of our Services. To know how to exercise your right to deletion, please refer to the section titled: “Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion“ from this Policy or contact us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below.
Objection and Restriction
. You may object to our processing of your PI or ask us to restrict processing of your PI. You may request objection, restriction and portability rights by contacting us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below.
Portability
. You may request portability of your PI.
Withdraw Consent
. If we have collected and processed your PI with your consent, then you can withdraw your consent at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your PI conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
File a complaint
. You have the right to file a complaint with a supervisory authority about our collection and processing of your PI.
d. Canada
While we take steps to maintain protection of your PI, your PI may be disclosed in response to valid demands or requests from governments, regulators, courts, and law enforcement authorities in those other jurisdictions or countries.
If you are a resident of Canada, you may have the following rights and choices:
Update your privacy settings
. You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings.
Manage marketing communications from us
. To update your marketing communication preferences, you can contact us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below. You may also click unsubscribe at the bottom of any marketing emails or messages.
Cookies and other tracking technologies
. If available in your country or mandated by law, you may be able to opt-out of interest based advertising by using the following
link
or by visiting the
Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada Opt-Out Page
,
NAI Opt-Out Page
and the
Choices Opt-Out Page
.
Access, Correction or Deletion
. You may make a request to access, to correct or to delete your PI (provided we no longer have a business need to retain your PI). You may request a copy of the PI or delete the PI in your Account by contacting us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below. You can edit and correct your PI at any time by changing it directly in our Services. Even if you request for your PI to be deleted, certain aspects may be retained for us to: meet our legal or regulatory compliance (e.g., maintaining records of transactions you have made with us); exercise, establish, or defend legal claims; and to protect against fraudulent or abusive activity on Site or while using our Services.
Withdraw consent
. You can withdraw your consent at any time to collection, use, and disclosure of your PI. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your PI conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
File a complaint
. You have the right to file a complaint with the applicable Privacy Commissioner about our collection and processing of your PI.
e. India
Where data of Indian individuals is involved, you agree that the “reasonable security practices and procedures“ under Section 43A's Explanation (ii) of the Information Technology Act, 2000 means this Privacy Statement and such data security procedures that we may implement from time to time, and which we may, in our discretion, give you notice from time to time.
What you can do to manage your privacy
You have choices when it comes to managing the privacy of your PI.
Update your privacy settings
. You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings
Manage marketing communications from us
. To update your marketing communication preferences, you can contact us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below.
Correct your PI
. You can edit and correct your PI at any time by changing it directly in our Services.
f. Mexico
If you are a resident of Mexico, you may have the following choices and rights (known as “ARCO rights“):
You have choices when it comes to managing the privacy of your PI and exercising your ARCO rights. Please note that we are required to verify your request prior to exercising your rights. After we have received a request, our response will indicate whether the request for access, rectification, cancellation or opposition is appropriate and, if so, the determination will be made within 15 business days from such date. The deadlines may be extended under the terms set out in the applicable laws.
Access
. You have the right to know what personal data we have about you, what we use it for and the conditions of use we give to it. Electronic copies of your personal data will be provided if you exercise your right of access. You may request a copy of the Personal Data by requesting it on the “
My data
“ Section of our Services. When making a request, please provide a clear and precise description of the personal data you wish to access and any other information that facilitates the location of your data.
Rectification
. You have the right to request the correction of your personal data if it is outdated, inaccurate, or incomplete (Rectification). You can edit and correct your Personal Data at any time by by accessing your profile on the Settings sections of the Services.
Deletion/Cancellation
. You have the right to request that we remove your PI from our records or databases when you consider that it is not being used in accordance with the principles, duties, and obligations provided for in the applicable laws. To know how to exercise your right to deletion, please refer to the section titled: “Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion“ from this Policy or contact us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below. When making a request, please provide a clear and precise description of the personal data you wish to delete/cancel or any other information that facilitates the location of your data.
Opposition/Rejection
. You have the right to oppose the use of your personal data for specific purposes. You may request objection, restriction and portability rights by contacting us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below. When making a request, please provide a clear and precise description of the personal data you wish to oppose, or any other information that facilitates the location of your data.
Update your privacy setting
s. You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings and, if available in your country or mandated by law, manage your cookies using the following
link
.
Manage marketing communications from us
. To update your marketing communication preferences, you can contact us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below.
How to limit the use and disclosure of your PI
If you are a resident of Mexico, you also have the right to limit the use or disclosure of your PI by contacting us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below.
How to withdraw your consent
If you are a resident of Mexico, you also have the right to withdraw your consent for our processing of your PI by contacting us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below.
g. Thailand
Legal Basis of Processing
We use your PI only as permitted by law. The Thai Personal Data Protection Act (“PDPA“) requires us to have a “legal basis“ for collecting your PI. Our legal basis for collecting and using the PI described in this Privacy Statement will depend on the type of PI and the specific context in which we collect it. However, we will normally process PI from you when:
We have your consent to do so;
We have a contract with you and it is necessary to process your PI to perform our contract with you, including to provide you with the benefits of our Services and operate our business;
The processing is in our legitimate business interests, such as operating our businesses, improving and developing Services, communicating with you, marketing our offerings and services, and personalizing your experience, and to detect illegal activities; and/or
To comply with legal requirements, including applicable laws and regulations.
If you are a resident of Thailand, you may have the following rights and choices:
Update your privacy settings
. You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings and, if available in your country or mandated by law, manage your cookies using the following
link
.
Manage marketing communications from us
. To update your marketing communication preferences, you can change your notification preferences by going to the “Settings“ section of your Account.
Access, Correction, Anonymization or Deletion
. You may request to access, to correct, or to delete your PI. You can edit and correct your PI at any time by changing it directly in our Services. To make a request for access you may do it by requesting it on the “My data“ Section of our Services. To know how to exercise your right to deletion, please refer to the section titled: “Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion“ from this Policy or contact us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below.
Objection and Restriction
. You may object to our processing of your PI or ask us to restrict processing of your PI. You may request objection, restriction and portability rights by contacting us at the contact information provided in Section “Contact Us“, below.
Portability
. You may request portability of your PI.
Withdraw Consent
. If we have collected and processed your PI with your consent, then you can withdraw your consent at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your PI conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
File a complaint
. You have the right to file a complaint with a supervisory authority about our collection and processing of your PI.
11. Links to Other Services
In certain sections of our Services, we may include links to third-party websites or applications (for example, Facebook and Twitter). These websites and applications are governed by their own privacy policies or information collection practices, which may be substantially different from ours. We do not guarantee and are not responsible for the privacy or security of these websites, including the accuracy, completeness or reliability of information found on these websites. If you follow links to websites not affiliated or controlled by us, we encourage you to review the privacy policies and information collection practices of any external websites and apps, as those parties' practices would not be subject to this Policy.
12. Location of Information Processing
Our Services are controlled and operated by us from the United States. Your information may be stored and processed in any country where we have facilities or in which we engage service providers, including the United States, which may have data protection laws that are different from those of your country. In addition, your information may be subject to access requests from governments, courts, or law enforcement officials in countries where it may be processed, under the laws of those countries.
13. Security
The security of your PI is important to us, and we employ physical, technical, and administrative security measures designed to safeguard the information collected by the Services. We use industry standard SSL (secure socket layer technology) encryption to transfer PI. Other security safeguards include, but are not limited to, data encryption, firewalls, and physical access controls to buildings and files. We also conduct periodic audits of our security (no less than annually) to apply best practices and reasonable industry standards. However, no data transmission over the Internet can be guaranteed to be completely secure. If there is a breach of our security, we will notify you where required by law or deemed necessary and appropriate under the circumstances.
Account holders create a password in the registration process. You can help protect against unauthorized access to your Account and PI by selecting and protecting your password appropriately and limiting access to your computer and browser by signing off after you have finished accessing your Account. At registration, we assign a Member ID to each Account and use those Member IDs to authenticate logins, allow access to the subscription content, and monitor compliance. The Member ID is also used to authenticate users when requesting technical support. Access to information is limited (through user/password credentials and two-factor authentication) to those employees who require it to perform their job functions.
Some of the precautions we take to protect PI includes: (a) limiting employee access to PI to only those employees with a need to such access to fulfill their job responsibilities; (b) conducting background checks on our employees and, specifically, upon all employees that may have access to PI; (c) requiring employees to sign confidentiality agreements upon hiring; (d) conducting regular employee privacy and data security training and education; and (e) protecting PI with commercially reasonable technical, contractual, administrative, and physical security safeguards.
Please be aware, however, that no information system can be guaranteed to be 100 percent secure, so we cannot guarantee the absolute security of your information. Moreover, we are not responsible for the security of information you transmit to the Services over networks that we do not control, including the internet and wireless networks. If you have reason to believe that your interaction with us is not secure, please contact us as described in Section “Contact Us“ below.
14. Changes to Our Privacy Policy
We constantly try to provide the best services, and accordingly our Policy will change from time to time. If we substantially update this Policy, we will notify you by posting the revised Policy on our Services, and for certain revisions that materially expand the ways in which we use or share the information previously collected from you through the Services, either display an alert next to the Policy, display an alert upon login to the Services, or directly communicate with you (e.g. via our messaging service or the email address associated with your Account).
15. Contact Us
Chess.com LLC is in the United States of America and we are the operator for all our Services. You may contact
Support
if you have any questions, complaints, or other issues related to this Policy and issues related to your information.
For all Accounts
Mailing address:
Chess.com LLC
877 E 1200 S #970397
Orem, UT 84097
Contact Support
here
16. Chess Play & Learn (Arcade Version)
This Section contains the provisions that only apply specifically to our mobile application known as Chess - Play & Learn (Arcade Version) (the “App“). This section is intended to complement the Policy above and it does not apply to our Sites or other Services.
Data Collection and Use
The App collects non-identifiable gameplay data to send to Apple iCloud, specifically to record a User's progress (win record) vs. the App's built-in roster of computer opponents. We do not store any of this data, but it is sent to Apple services (iCloud and Game Center) for storage and use.
The App also collects the User's anonymized Game Player ID for the App's “Online Play“ feature, where it is used to maintain a chess skill rating as online games are played. This helps ensure Users are matched with opponents of similar skill levels.
The Game Player ID is also used to maintain a list of chess puzzles the User has solved in the App's “Daily Puzzle“ feature and may also be used for other App features if that is necessary to fulfill a User request. The processing of this data is subject to your consent and you are able to revoke such consent by changing the settings from your device.
The App is available to Users through the different app stores and collects non-identifiable gameplay data from all Users. The basis for this collection of information is to support the internal operations of the App and your consent in some cases.
User Agreement
Privacy Policy
Subscriber Agreement
Fair Play Policy
Community Policy
Competitive Events Policy
Gifting Policy
Giveaways Policy
Courses Terms
Compliance
Ready to Play Chess?
Play Online
Play Friends
Play Bots
Tournaments
Play Now
About Your Privacy
We and our
161
partners store and access personal data, like browsing data or unique identifiers, on your device. Selecting I Accept enables tracking technologies to support the purposes shown under we and our partners process data to provide. Selecting Reject All or withdrawing your consent will disable them. If trackers are disabled, some content and ads you see may not be as relevant to you. You can resurface this menu to change your choices or withdraw consent at any time by clicking the Privacy Settings link on the bottom of the webpage  .Your choices will have effect within our Website. For more details, refer to our Privacy Policy.
We and our partners store and/or access information on a device, such as unique IDs in cookies to process personal data. You may accept or manage your choices by clicking below, including your right to object where legitimate interest is used, or at any time in the privacy policy page. These choices will be signaled to our partners and will not affect browsing data.
You may also adjust your Privacy Settings at any time if you navigate to the footer of the page.
Data usage may include:
Use precise geolocation data. Store and/or access information on a device. Develop and improve services. Create profiles for personalised advertising. Use limited data to select advertising. Use profiles to select personalised advertising. Measure advertising performance. Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources.
List of Partners (Vendors)
Reject All
I Accept
Privacy Settings